That’s amazing! Can you send me a link please?
Yea as amazing as this looks there is no way the cost is worth it when there are so few major airline crashes yearly.
Cuentan cosas del último vagón de cada metro, si eres gay té puede interesar. Si no, no. 
Manafort is getting deep dicked by Bobby Three Sticks. 
Silence...I guess that is your answer.
So I’ve often wondered this...  Like I know most politicians don’t know a lot of what’s going on. And like you said, need-to-know basis. So I’ve always wondered...who *does* know all the dirty secrets, confidential information, and hidden doors, so to speak? Like what person or group knows all the shit that goes on behind closed doors?  I’m sure it’s some people no one’s ever heard of which would make sense. But it’s just fascinating that there’s a layer below the politics and general government where shit actually happens. 
I actually dig this 
Hey we all need that reminder sometimes. Future you in a love affair with life will thank current you for your contributions.
Yeah, mine is...okay with it.  He seems to want to pick up shit just to fuck with me. And he really likes for me to have something to offer and waits for it. 
Oh it rolls up too? Awesome! Most cars that have the auto down won't do up, for safety concerns or some shit 
Like a Saks gift card? /s
Weight is related to your jumping ability in that explosiveness is measured in power to weight ratio. Lighter people have less weight, but also less muscle to generate power. Heavier people can have more muscle to generate power, but also have that extra weight that the have to move with that power. So the important thing is finding that fantastic middle ground where you have the maximal power to move your weight.  Don’t worry about judging yourself against LeBron. The man is an athletic and genetic freak. A freight train. He is pushing what we consider to be human limits. One of the most interesting parts of LeBrons life from a physiological point of view will be what happens to his body once he retires and starts to get old, because at the moment he seems to be defying age.  (Sorry for the spiel) For you though, just remember that adding muscle and weight may make you more explosive if you train right, but that also means more weight for that power to then move.  Best of luck!
They're only replacing the sign when it gets worn out, no extra money is being spent
How does the haakaa work? I never understood it. Are you supposed to attach it to the other boob when baby is feeding, and it catches the letdown so it doesn't get wiped away and wasted? Does the hakaa actually induce any suction or pumping? I never got letdown with the other boob when the baby was feeding.  That's a great amount too, good for you!
Can confirm. Source? Am source.
I seriously doubt there's a town in the entirety of Massachusetts where it's a matter of *chance* whether or not you get a restricted license though.
Broadly, perhaps.  This would be a replacement of the current tax system though, not additional. Remove all other company taxes and implement an inescapable yet highly attractive, simple sliding scale based on revenue.  I mean, a small % of a very big pie is better than 0% of a smaller (same as now) pie.  Market it so that companies *want* to be paying tax here in Australia.
Comedy is not protected speech sir, see Count Dankula.
Of course they do, but no one can catch 3 different kills in 3 different lanes like pimp can
Couldn't resist.. nice work. Ordered one...
Username definitely checks out lol
Just take a look at Tiger.  He absolutely dominated the competition.  Then one day, snap. Done.   The difficult part of golf isn't physical, its mental.
I'll give you the benefit of the doubt and assume you're not trolling.  Most of the reason why men are here is because they were unattractive and overlooked in the dating/courtship realm or their wives "loved them but weren't in love with them."  Attraction matters because most of them are obtained from being successful with God's marital roles and responsibilities matter. As a husband gets better at the Scriptural roles and responsibilities, he will become an excellent masculine leader, protector, and provider which are attractive to women.   This increase in attraction will tend to jump start their sex life in marriage again, and for singles it will increase the percentage of women that will accept when they ask them out on dates.  The fact that we have to discuss attraction in the first place sucks because the Church won't do it. What pastor is going to tell their singles congregation that they should hit the weights and get on a good nutrition plan to become more attractive to women if they want to go on more dates and lessen the chance of rejection? What pastor is going to tell their married couples that obesity is unattractive to both husbands and wives and that's a reason why their frequency of sex is decreasing? I'll believe it when I see it.
You know, as fucked up as it is, I still miss her. I’ll find myself wanting to call and tell her about my day or what the kids are up to. But I hold my ground because I know that any contact will not be good. 
Yaaay. It sounds like a non-issue that was escalated by misunderstandings. 
says on their website that the 2018 supports 38c with clearance. Not sure about the 2017. Apparently the 2018 frame is new from the 2017.
Pineapple and pepperoni is best.
We are well aware of logical fallacies.
THe dumbass cop here has his own lane He is stopped in a travel lane for no fucking reason. 
ubreakifix came into being in 2009 because a guy's friend broke his iPhone, or something. I forget. I remember they would learn from their friend's broken phones how to take them apart, and experiment how to fix them doing, buying broken phones on ebay and detailing painfully how they went about the process.  There are now hundreds of ubreakifix stores. Life uhh...finds a way.
&gt;I'm moving to the GTA. Any recommendations? :)  Prepare for disappointment.
So natural looking
I was just checking there wasn't some secret route I didn't know about...
Yeah they will be people that are going to complain about it but they will be a minority because almost everyone (atleast in this subreddit) don't care about Vivian and want her to be reworked or deleted.
Oh it may be down
Yeah I’m in the same boat. It’s very frustrating and discouraging. Why can’t any guy see how great I am 😂 lol 
You know the black box that always survives the crash?  Why don't we just make the whole plane out of that stuff?
The problem is more the fact that you can't create the additional mass to make a pound of fat from 3 ounces of anything. Even fat!
I had a thought today. We all have an inner voice. When I was depressed mine was always telling me to not do anything and quit. No my inner voice is always tellin me to try. Hearing something over and over does matter. It is self programming. 
I'm playing osu, so, same.
And as you can tell by the photo on the top right, It was mostly one mod in particular /s (I'm kidding /u/Honestly_ )
first off wheres that mf leak 
つ ◕_ ◕ ༽つ BAN MOD ༼ つ ◕_ ◕ ༽つ
Imagine being so incompetent you can't even beat the most hated woman in America without the help of Vladmir Putin.
I’m so loyal I hope he increases the price to $100 a month and it’s good for one movie a decade. 
Thank you. I keep trying to tell myself that.
I thought it was that Hawaiian or that crazy LA judge.
Teams go in phases. This season is perfect to rebuild, no one can shit on your after a treble of champions leagues. Manager resigned, best player wanted to leave. Sell of those on the wrong side of 30 for huge sums, hold it, see what the team and manager can do for a season (even the bench can make top 4), then reinvest heavily next season with no World Cup hype and an entire season to scout and recruit top talents.
Thank you! I enjoy Halo 3's multiplayer for the most part, but I can't STAND Halo 3 BTB. I absolutely love Halo: CE and Halo 2 BTB.
Which are those? 
This is the saddest attempt at trying to live in a fantasy world I've ever seen. It's so glaringly clear that she is as poor as dirt and can't rub two coins together. The desperation to escape that reality has become so overwhelming that she's resorted to posting stories about how well off she is and how her every day efforts to keep herself fed and out of poverty are just because of how hard she worked to escape poverty.    It's like one of those movies where a child is in a wonderful fantasy world full of magic and adventure, but in the end it turns out they are dying in hospital and it's all in their head.
This completely made my whole day! Listening to them again brought me actual joy! 
Wrong sub, this is STW sub, r/fortnitebr
My sister and I used to put bonnets on our Burmese and then we'd tuck him into a cradle...no wonder he's so twitchy, poor guy. She definitely sounds like she's your girl. It's always so much fun to see which people bond with what pets, and how that expresses itself. My boyfriend's kitten does it through draping all over my boy's face, and my fat kitty's favorite person is my dad. That is expressed through being very sad if my dad is out of eyeshot.   Cats are so fussy lol. Gotta love them even when they're dramatic. 
RIP FrankerZ :(
My family has been pretty awful during the wedding planning. His family treats me like I'm the only woman on the earth and I'm blessing them with my existence. It's the most humbling thing ever, so amazing, and makes me shake my fist at my family who has a history of treating me poorly. It's a good thing I live in his home state, not mine. 
Ah, nice.  I always thought that one was a bit crazy, though it was funny when you failed an install and gained the smart mutation or something like it.
Maybe we could work with just a different icon for the third part, and/or a fix to the ambush bug during that third part!
He was committed to a mental health facility, where he just walked out without being noticed by staff, and he was on medication in 2005 until he decided not to take it anymore.  In my mind, the point at which he decided to forgo medical treatment is the point at which he accepted responsibility for his actions. Like a drunk person consciously deciding to get behind the wheel of a car while intoxicated.
Why is everyone complaining about Bayleigh. She games a hell of a lot more than some of these HGs. Shes playing pretty hard and its fun to watch. Is she infuriating at times? Sure, but thats what makes her decent TV.  No one wants some sort of koombayah on feeds.
I did it over 3 weeks ago. Was difficult for me to do the 16/8 because I would just forget and eat outside window. Switched to 20/4 for one day and felt it was rediculous to have to do dishes twice. Went to OMAD and haven't looked back. Down 15lbs including water. Lifts still going up every session (just rocked 505x6 deadlift yesterday- go me), and weight going down daily. Just so much easier to stuff my face once per day and not have to worry about food. Downside is I kind of crash hard for an hour after "the feeding". 
Yeah, the game is definitely good. It’s just shitty in what little live service it manages to do
Mass hysteria.
Πάνε ελδυκ, μπες ορχήστρα ελδυκ. Thank me later.
Any close to a line at least?
Create something to censor it? Bad usernames will be skipped? More than likely the best player in the game won't have a bad username either because there account will have been banned before being a higher tier player, I dunno.
Im playing right now, i dont have a framerate analyzer like digital foundry, but if i was to guess id imagine it hovers in the mid 40's with drops to 30's on occasion. Because im experiencing major framedrops in Conquest 
I’d like some of your devil’s food cake 😉
They only get hate by those who don’t have one.
The CGI at the 8 second mark didn't even hold up in the theatre. It's the only part other than Banner with the helmet down with the hulkbuster that threw me off with his new suit or any of the other CGI. I always wonder if it would be simpler and funnier to have them emote through the suit rather then take the helmet off.  Like when Thor lands and Banner is like "You're in trouble now". I'd rather watch and hear him say that through the suit as hulk buster.
Being primarily a solo sloop this event is looking like it’s going to be a nightmare for me. Just ran into an alliance of multiple galleons at Golden Sands who stole my sloop when I tried starting the campaign and proceeded to kill me when I scuttled, making me go all the way back to Golden Sands again.  So yeah, seems to me like there’s still fighting to the death but with crews working together.
The missions I played so far had a much more Halo feel, which is awesome. On spark, holding back and taking out all the heavy shanks rather then just running up on all enemies was really fun. And that boss fight was totally unexpected!  I would love to have the option of playing the campaign on a harder difficulty on the first playthrough! 
Death Note
Thank you for your service and I hope your needs are being met now!
Here's the unfortunate thing with me - if it's predictable, I'm not going to like it.  Most recent example -  Before the seminar began, we were in the break room with the professors &amp; one of the was talking about how one of his students thanked him. He said "If I had only a few days left to live..".  I burst out laughing at this point, because I saw where this joke was going. The professor continued "... I'd like to spend it in your class". He said he asked why. The student replies "Because in your class, a minute feels like a year". I was done 2 sentences ago.  Or even in Captain America - Civil War, when Cap meets Spidey for the first time - I literally said Cap's line for him, with him. Paraphrasing below. Cap - "Where're you from?" Spidey - "Queens" Cap - "Brooklyn" Saw that coming.  Yesterday, when I was watching a Bo Burnham stand up - I caught something before Bo himself said it.  To put it simply I like jokes that are novel.  But, that's just me. I can't speak for all.
Replied 
There is a lot of old-school attitude in DC FEMS
http://leagueoflegends.wikia.com/wiki/Deathfire_Grasp
i would love to hear from other Christians, but Im a little scared - i've just been so attacked, mocked (or shunned at church) for sharing some minor political views on my facebook feed (I'm moderate left).   I can only imagine what would happen if I shared my more intense and personal experience above.   any suggestions on christian subs that wouldn't be so judgy?  
Dude...
Clearly
Är du harakiri gubben?
I'm a BA/MA psychology and same. It's not because we're not invested in the field but because diagnosing fictional characters is pointless. Diagnosis is mostly so that you can have something to put down on the insurance forms; it's not necessary to label someone in order to treat them. Plus, since they're fictional characters, unless you're planning on writing fanfiction, you're not going to be treating them.  Or the opposite, in a way. I recently watched the Patrick Melrose miniseries. You don't need to be a psychologist to say "being molested as a child screwed him up." In other words, what's wrong with most fictional characters is blatantly obvious.
on here, sure. In the media there are guys that say he shouldn't even be a third stringer he's so bad. Personally I think he's a fine QB who took a nice step this last season. 
You are so boring and dumb. Lol. I’m logging into my other account so I can get a break from your retardation. Lol. I’m sure you have more important fish to troll. Lol. Loser. 
Ah, "kyclkingrulle", min favorit: "kyckling, isberg sala,gurka,färsk tomater,lök,valfritt sås"
Or just not have you spawn with all the shit.
Sounds like the police are doing exactly what they're supposed to do - hold the kids accountable but protect **everyone** and not give in to a mob mentality.  And let's be honest here -  the offense, while regrettable, is really not that bad.  People need to have some perspective.
I just had to Google the Sensory board and that's an awesome idea, thanks!
True, although the 1080ti runs my pro flawlessly in every game i've played, definitely gonna need some more power for the pimax hmd for next year.
for some reason people think the format of texting and reddit one liners or otherwise sub thirty second communications, require the polish of 1,000 anal retentive English teachers imbued in every inch for no reason at all
I am the [mod] senate
I recommend holding onto a green Mori for that, as yellows are unreliable as they rely on the survivor being the last, so basically you HAVE to 4k to get the credit.
I swear I learned more in my first day then a year of tech school
You are going to make life more difficult for yourself if you refuse to listen to an expert with special knowledge just because you are in a more powerful position within a hierarchy. 
Two matches made. Luuucckky! Your  Grandfather had excellent taste in beverages. 
NERF SINGED 
China is a nice place
Congrats!
I mean people could match more than once
That's what it seems like. 
When I first saw this article from bloomberg.com, its title was: &gt; Why the Firearms Industry Doesn't Care About 3-D Printed Guns  Here are some other articles about this story:  * nytimes.com: [Trump Is ‘Looking Into’ 3-D Printed Plastic Guns](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/07/31/us/politics/3d-guns-trump.html) * qz.com: [3D printed guns are here, but that's not what we should be worried about](https://qz.com/1344798/3d-printed-guns-are-legal-in-the-us-but-homemade-guns-are-nothing-new/) * spokesman.com: [Trump ‘looking into’ 3D guns issue](http://www.spokesman.com/stories/2018/jul/31/trump-looking-into-3d-guns-issue/) * reuters.com: [Trump questions 3-D gun sales allowed by his administration](https://www.reuters.com/article/us-usa-trump-guns/trump-questions-3-d-gun-sales-allowed-by-his-administration-idUSKBN1KL1SZ) * texastribune.org: [Following lawsuits, Texas company's plans to upload blueprints for 3D-printed guns are on hold](https://www.texastribune.org/2018/07/31/texas-company-pauses-uploading-blueprints-3d-printed-guns/)  -----  I am a bot trying to encourage a balanced news diet.  These are all of the articles I think are about this story. I do not select or sort articles based on any opinions or perceived biases, and neither I nor my creator advocate for or against any of these sources or articles. It is your responsibility to determine what is factually correct.
Bad rats
They're quite affordable as is.
I said nothing about a wall....
Reports say the burn just left the Islanders as a free agent.
What do you think, as of now, about giving the beekeeper a return as a normal tower like in btd4. I'm only asking for your current thoughts on the subject.
I came here to comment on this, I live near the rockies and the river that flows through our city was ice just a few weeks before, tap water is actually cold here. I can't imagine places with lukewarm tap water.
We utiliser Google Traduction and we feel FRANÇAIS 
NEXT!!!!
Yea me too but there is still nothing 
i asked the same question. its due to the expanding universe. space itself is expanding, and it pushes the photons. thats how the observable universe can be so big even though the universe itself isnt that old i.e. its 13billion years whereas light has seemingly travelled 45 billion lightyears   edit: i could be wrong. i asked on this sub before and tbh the answers werent comprehensive.  bizzare to think about expanding space's effects on photons.
Care to elaborate? 
Hahaha I am going to go to 10k orbs. At 5000 orbs used atm, so half way. If I don't get Yoru, I guess Imma just go find a new game lol too many golden showers for 8% and dupes are useless AF
Nope, just stock
I might change it to chomper
Great perspective and you’re right. I wouldn’t have tried this Equinox at all if it mentioned smoke but not that I have it and know how minimum it is, I’m now considering keeping it. 
In the case of the Tau, I believe their core worlds are beyond the light of the Astronomican, although I might be wrong on that. Regardless, the Tau are a nuisance, rather than a threat, and when faced with real threats like Hive Fleets, Ork Waagh! and Black Crusades and Plague Wars, they haven't really got the time or resources to launch a crusade against the Tau right now.
Charizard on the map???
https://www.howtogeek.com/howto/windows-vista/add-take-ownership-to-explorer-right-click-menu-in-vista  Boom?
let 'em all die
ooooooor...........   Someone said, "hey, I bet we could get a lot of views if we made a video of one of us pretending to be a Meth head listening to Sepultura......."
Massive massive update came out last week. You may as well call it no mans sky 2. Whole new game and multiplayer. 
No problem at all hunter
**Exchange Additions From The Last 12 Hours**  Coin|Exchange -|- EOS|poloniex MAN|yobit FTC|yobit TOMO|yobit QASH|yobit DRGN|yobit MNX|hitbtc   Coin|Market|Exchange -|-|- EOS|USDT|poloniex EOS|ETH|poloniex EOS|BTC|poloniex DRGN|RUR|yobit TOMO|BTC|yobit TOMO|ETH|yobit TOMO|WAVES|yobit DRGN|USD|yobit DRGN|BTC|yobit MAN|BTC|yobit TOMO|USD|yobit DRGN|DOGE|yobit MAN|USD|yobit MAN|ETH|yobit MAN|DOGE|yobit FTC|BTC|yobit FTC|WAVES|yobit QASH|USD|yobit FTC|USD|yobit QASH|ETH|yobit QASH|WAVES|yobit TOMO|DOGE|yobit FTC|DOGE|yobit MAN|RUR|yobit QASH|RUR|yobit FTC|RUR|yobit DRGN|WAVES|yobit FTC|ETH|yobit MAN|WAVES|yobit TOMO|RUR|yobit DRGN|ETH|yobit QASH|BTC|yobit QASH|DOGE|yobit MNX|ETH|hitbtc MNX|USD|hitbtc MNX|BTC|hitbtc   **For Live Updates Checkout [ExchangeScanner](https://ExchangeScanner.com)** **For Project Updates Follow Us On Twitter [@ExchangeScanner](https://twitter.com/exchangescanner)**
his best outro track period
Not really one for FGO but Heracles likes Weaving. Queen Omphale wanted to humiliate him by having him wear a dress and weave, but it released so much stress he actually started to enjoy it.
Or just only date leftists
Clorox seeds, big fan of those
It was ceramic, but it did not plug in. The bottom was open so you could set it over a candle or whatnot. 
So, you'd be wrong too.  You must get a lot of tickets.
Yeah you may of opened a programme they would of thought was a cheat programme, I once got banned for having gta single player hacks 
Yes, it was on XFactor.
The "Real Life Chun Li"!
How about 2% off your total bill when you bring your own bags and don't pay 15c to buy one? This obviously wouldn't apply unless you charge for the bags.
I've never seen these guys before. I'm not into rock climbing or weightlifting. But for some reason I watched the whole video, found it pretty interesting.
that's why I like him, he and I are kindred spirits 
Oh yeah. They crossed the border...  I guess it's okay to lock them up like animals then...
I was at the game right before the ASG. Unfortunately my ride had to leave before the 10th inning. Heard about the Doz grandslam by radio. 
I don’t think you’re right about that.  The issue is that the language gives the club the right to wiggle out of all unpaid guaranteed money.
Kenny Brown
I'll eat a big-mac
That they forever can't remember the name of a song/movie but it is right on the tip of their tunge.
HOW ABSOLUTELY DARE YOU, SIR!?
same could be said for Moviepass subscribers 
I was asked last-minute to be a second photographer for a friend's daughter's wedding. The dress code is "business casual, no blue jeans," per him, and this is the [venue](http://blancdenver.com/photo-gallery/weddings/). What should I wear? I need to be comfortably on my feet for six hours, with a full range of motion, so hard no on heels, skirts or dresses. I was thinking of getting some slip-on leather sneakers that don't look like tennis shoes, but I could use some FFA input!
I have all except the Teq trunks, the kefla, and str gohan
aye.   Funny how even today we still use 'archaic' forms of tech, no?
I don’t get what is with your hostility, but whatever suits your style of talking to people.   Also that’s a purely subjective opinion, some people would rather just beat the game.  And honestly, you might be right, maybe it truly is impossible.  I couldn’t be bothered to actually search for someone who has done it before.  I just don’t think it’s that hard of a map to the point that it would be impossible.
Marvel doesn’t need silly things like speed force. Even in dc, Superman is pretty fast without speed force. 
It's a real shame for sure. Players often try to find some kind of compromise with the TO to make sure they can play multiple games without holding up brackets too much, but for a guy in Leffen's position who likely has a realistic shot at top 8 in smash but would have to win a lot of matches in DBFZ where people still wouldn't bet on him, good on him for making a call.
No problem :D
That was a story around these parts. I still remember the game. 
There’s no upper limit on the ratings, 7* will go above 15
lol. I've already taken those years off
Hot pic
Same problem here :(  I assume its the bundle itself that should be marketable, its what you get as the Ultra Rare in the package after all.
Coffee is actually mildly hydrating.
I didn’t compare the two
I prefer my grapes whole and my comments passive aggressive. 
And you’re absolutely right about this. The message itself is not the problem, the way he presents it is.  This is just one of the times he acted like this, tho. He tends to get insufferable with a whole lot of subjects.
Nobody would’ve received a ticket if they hadn’t driven up on the shoulder. Simple as that. Doesn’t matter if the guy at the front of the line is in the right or not; the shoulder pass is still illegal.
not a real van = not a real fan
I personally love Old Navy.   I can't afford Dolce and Gabbana, so I can't really compare the two.
Eew, gross.
I agree. He's terrible but I can't hate the guy. Will always root for him. 
One day I'll produce stuff again and we'll bring it back
Maybe, we should not call this evil, for it is our very nature 
It's not the worst idea man. He's come off from a great World Cup performance so they can still milk some money out for him. Meaning they just have more money to burn through in either the winter or next summer (more likely)
Anyone interested   W2C: https://m.superbuy.com/en/goodsdetail/?url=https://m.intl.taobao.com/detail/detail.html?id=565179710629
A “shrek is love shrek is life” reference in 2018?  That’s a surprise to be sure, but a welcome one
People match with more than one other person. 
do not
I think the price from this batch are olive , wilhelm and orlandu. got olive and wilhelm.
zoz
We had a crew that was part of an alliance have the same issue, we got the sails then they completed their stuff and it never gave them the option to tell Sharron about Wanda, even though they have the accommodations. 
Hi there! We can help. With Whispersync for Voice you would need to own both Ebook and Audible version. Learn more here: https://adbl.co/2vamSU7. Any questions just let us know! ^BO
get to level 50. complete all the weekly's and find the secret battle stars. do 60 of the 74 daily's and that should be enough stars.
I guess we’re the official forums now. I haven’t seen much favoritism of Genji from him lately, so I have no clue on what you’re going on about.
I see it as being able to live the lifestyle you want without having to rely on paid work or benefactors (eg parents}.  The assets and investments required to generate the necessary income to support it vary wildly between individuals. 100x? 1000x?  Lower tiers may or may not be at the level perceived to be "rich". 
Moreover, any iconic role model of today's standards will always be flawed in some way. But we as a society seek to revere the good, commendable qualities of a person and try to incorporate them in our lives.  Similarly, Gatsby was flawed in various ways; Fitzgerald is not suggesting to be Gatsby but rather, be *like* Gatsby. That is, incorporate some of Gatsby's admirable qualities.  "His dream must have seemed so close that he could hardly fail to grasp it. He did not know that it was already behind him."   One of Gatsby's greatest flaws was his stubbornness to move on and to stop living in the past. However, at the same time, Gatsby's passion, desire to succeed, and unwavering motivation is quite respectable. 
&gt; I think it might be right since it's from mirror.co.uk   The Mirror is a horrendous source to be honest. But I'm not sure if it's the right figure.  &gt; the reason to why this fight isn't happening right now is because of Eddie Hearn   \+Shelly Finkel if we're being fair. But no point going over the same things as already has been said.  &gt; Eddie Hearn already admitted it on an IFLTV interview with Carl Froch where he said that Carl Froch is right about saying that Eddie Hearn's job as the promoter is to not fight boxers as dangerous as Wilder and instead fight easier opponents.   Do you have the link or remember the title? 
Are these 1 panel gags? I'm not actually sure how to read these
I have a flip phone and haven't leapt to a smartphone yet.  It's intimidating and seems to require a steep learning curve.
it adds to the fun
WGU is certs heavy for IT.
What floor is this?
I showed my husband a sibling group of 4 kids. So.freaking.gorgeous. I want them... insta-family!
Thank you 😊
Yeah there’s definitely a sweet spot with scanning birds. I’m just used to how easy it was in Atlas Rises. 
The chinless part seems to imply that she's either obese or has a saggy chin, but the flat chest implies otherwise. I guess she's probably quite skinny with saggy skin. I don't know if I trust Cersei's judgment. She seems to think of everyone except herself, Jaime and her kids as hideous.
So, a fucked up greyhound?
Why are some people here being annoying lol  Just because this is free for you doesn’t mean everyone will find it super easy, remember, not everyone is as good at the game as you are.
zle
eat me please
Paradajsusa
I've just learned about macros from these lovely people. Stay under carbs 20g-25g. Try to meet your calculated protein macro. Fat is not necessary to reach the macro its a limit. Your body has fat it will burn as you eat good protein sources cooked in or with healthy fats and stay low carb. But I too havent felt very hungry lately and struggle to reach my goals. IF 16:8. Im trying to have a dense meal of good protein to make sure I'm eating enough but rarely do. Going to save this post to follow!
That's probably a phase.
&gt; I found it extremely interesting that the show chose to showcase the extreme dichotomy between both Sansa and Daenerys when it came to not only dealing with the shortage of food, but general ruling as well. Sansa's scenes in S7 showed her being primarily concerned about preparing for winter and helping her people, while Daenerys was destroying Westerosi lands, threatening her advisors, and making awful ruling decisions (her decision to go save Jon at the wall being her dumbest)  Excellent observation about the food issue... thanks for this. 
This is the epitome of waste in public office
huh?
You should read all what Wes Morriston have written about the argument if you haven't already, some of his papers are [available online](http://spot.colorado.edu/~morristo/selected-papers.html)
o now I feel dumb LMAO.  I think people kinda knew what I meant though haha.
Thanks for this tidbit.  I’m guessing she will have some synergy with Vision?
Brosplit in 2018?!?! That is about as old skool as it gets. Up the frequency man, hit each bodypart 2-3x each week!
Buy lots of assorted nuts, dried fruits, apples, bananas, 2-3 jars of peanut butter, 3 loafs of bread and stick 2 in the freezer, a few boxes of cereal and cartons of soy or rice milk. Foods like these are good for noshing or snacking before and after main meals. Save the special ingredients for breakfast, lunch and dinner meals. Make him pay for half. Getting mad at someone for eating to much is not good.
zozzle
Their tiny hands on the chest had the same structure as their main legs. Just the bendable end used for digging or holding something.
The plot was incredibly predictable. The two of them walked onto the screen and gave their spiels. I immediately called what was going to happen from there. The thing is there was no attempt at a misdirect or anything.
Thanks for the insight, much appreciated 
FH and I make basically the same amount and we contribute to our household expenses equitably, so whatever it costs for mortgage, utilities, groceries, etc. - we put all that necessary money + just a little extra into a joint account each month. We contribute to the account based on % of income we bring to the table... but for his 'income' calculation, we do it net of any child support stuff he has going on. Our split ends up being 60/40 instead of 50/50.   I guess I end up paying "more" ... but the things I'm feeding in the 60/40 scenario are just what it takes for us to have our life the way we want it. I suppose we could do 50/50 contributions and then he just has less money for savings/retirement contributions, but to me that doesn't exactly help us both achieve our financial goals. We are very fortunate, and I would rather us both feel successful in what we are doing and affording than put him in a situation where he's paycheck-to-paycheck and I'm rolling in cash (slight exaggeration there). 
The little island I landed on measures in at ~1032ft in length at the longest point end to end. That's only 32ft longer than the minimum rated landing distance of the P51 (according to what I found, anyway), and puts you within less than a wingspan of falling off. Took me a few tries to get down on this one.
I'd like to see Zdeno Chara play the part of Willy Wonka
??? You really think what's stopping kids from doing all that is the fact that their schooling is not free? 
Honestly, I'd feel a helluva lot safer if my taxes went towards more stuff like this.
thatsthejoke.jpg
1 hour until then....
Why would you want to play with randoms? I thought playground mode was for F R I E N D S
Need one for cough syrup in my state 
But I have contractual and professional duties to the patient - is it truly a gratuitous bailment? 
Ah, thank you.  Those details will help.  As far as styling, could you tell me what the style of the first suit is in my imgur album?  Or maybe the one worm by Joseph Gordon Levitt?
Wow u cured me 
Well, the 11 straight games is the fault of Stanford and USC who play ND the last week of the season on alternate years, meaning someone else in the Pac12 has to be on bye that week.
Got a Gurley jersey at the end of the year, was already psyched, but just a *little* extra excited that he's gonna be an longtime Ram.  Crossing my fingers, then hopefully pickin' up a jersey for Donald next
Good Stormtrooper.  Alexa play imperial death march
when they were in the Rv dancing and asian andy was drunk crying
Do you think another reason they were left unpainted is to show off their sculpting skills? A painted surface could hide imperfections 
Opened about 30, got one level 50 one gold qop and one WD
It makes me think that those decks aren't shit, and T2 and T3 are closer to good than we give them credit for.
I can see why she's ur fiance 
I can't read Chinese and the English wiki's don't have that information.
Well they can be charming or initially convincing but they unravel when challenged and they become less stable as they age especially . Being young, interesting , successful, important or good looking gives them enough to function  but as soon as that goes away through age or similar  , they are relying on a healthy esteem which they don't have. Untreated it only gets worse and worse.
Jeez, for that price you're getting into Grimsmo territory.
Yeah tell me about it...
1- it's been awhile since I played through 4 (over ten years) but I'm amazed I don't remember Verdugo. That easily looks like the best mutation in that game from what I recall. Kinda makes me want to replay it just to take notice of it.  2- That is one bad ass quote. That is some amazing charector writing from a game of that period. Damn where was that writer for some of the later elder scrolls.   3- Amazed that English is your third language and equally disappointed in myself, lol. If only I could learn to speak just one language properly.
i guess he's just leaving out the part about forcing his sick, suicidal wife to get drunk and fuck 6 black guys against her will while he watches and films it?    just leaving that out, i guess?
With like, 2 exceptions, they cannot. 
They should be banned permanently. 
Should have what? What are you offering?
Damm i think i would hate the warriors in this case since my hometown is in the same division when will us Seals catch a break
Because Rockstar hates us.  No but seriously it would be too easy I think, even if it had endless NCP's you're still basically guaranteed ~$500k. 
Same can be applied to the Waltons and Kochs though, and everyone else on the list.
I mean most of it is facetious. I don’t think he actually hates UCF as much as he pretends to, but he has a legitimate reason to be upset about his rank. He shouldn’t be below Westballz, period
Oooo nice
Yeah let’s get em guys lol
We just need to up the challenges then! Make it so they dont survive long enough to receive treatment lol
R/WOOSH
Assuming its the same for Canada, you got that .5 points because you clocked out too early. 9 minutes or less is what doesn't give you a point. Also, 9 minutes or less is how late you can be clocking in before getting a point.   Example: if your shift ends at 6:00PM, you can clock out any time between 5:51 and 6:00. If your shift starts at 7:00AM, you can clock in any time between 7:00 and 7:09. 
Pretty sure treasure is bugged. Tons of complaints are being tossed around reddit since it was released
In each monsters statblock there is a description, right under the name, that gives their size and monster type. For instance, a goblin is listed as a Small humanoid. 
Ok, it's pretty - but at least I don't work in Froopy Land.  Say hi to king Tommy for me.
Kik me = martinytiny 
Yup out of the box. Texture are smooth for both, but the hyperx is more smoother. I have both on the same desk lol. I have an L desk and the hyperx is used for gaming and the other for work. I used to game with the Qck, but I play with such low sensitivity and dpi (.71 in game in csgo, 250 dpi) so I needed faster pad and switched to hyperx. The qck has a stickier feeling with the same mouse setting. It's stickier so it has more control for fps gaming. 
/u/Alwyn1989 Your post &gt;If a guy nearly runs you over on your motorbike would you run after thrm and smash your head through their window? was mentioned since it was deleted by the restrictive rules of /r/AskReddit. If you would like to use the text box with your question, feel free to repost your question here on /r/AskRedditUL without restrictions. Subscribe to this subreddit for more unrestricted questions.
Anyone who depends on service dogs will be in a bad situation.
KK scores.  3-0 now.  Go Rays!
Indeed.  All jobs and places you have lived in a time frame.  They don't always tell you up front.  Some of us have moved a lot and require notes to provide this information. Common for USPS, Fedex, UPS.  Deeper if you must obtain general customs clearance.
Something that is on that breaker is getting shorted out. My grandparents had this happen with some outdoor lights that were getting water in them.
We gonna get this one in boys?
*He also know how to avoid it*  So you're saying he cheated?
Herbs &amp; Rye?
That looked like a piss missile off the bat 
Presumably had a lot to do with the Clean Air Act Amendment of 1990 (effective '94) that treated car emissions and truck emissions differently.
Lets be real, objectives are all bullshit except for very specialized jobs.  As an applicant, if a company asks me to produce a cover letter or anything else aside from my education, credentials, and work experience  then I'm not interested in the job.  I've never seen in my 22 years of employment objectives or cover letters come up in the real world work place.   There is also no way I'm going to believe recruiters actually read every single cover letter or objective list.  It's would be a colossal waste of company time.  Especially since %90 of that crap is made up/graveling to stroke a company's ego.  Protip most people want the job to pay bills, second to that is career passion.  Just hire the most qualified and maybe then we would stop having so many idiots in jobs they clearly aren't qualified for.  
It's not a life story it's a username
Well this fo has absolutely killed it on recent trades outside of chapman and cueto. And i dont really fault them for cueto, they got at least one big prospect and 2 more that were showing promise. They havent panned out yet, but thats the nature of trades.   The biggest criticism would be trades they didnt make like cozart last year and Harvey and gennet this year. Im withoulding judegement on the lack of Gennet trade since we dont know what they were offered. And harvey could still get traded if a conteneder wants him down the stretch. 
Jaina? That's a grindy attrition deck. And what's wrong with control decks having win conditions? Every MtG control deck runs some kind of bomb finishers. Not every control deck has to be armoring up while the opponent fatigues to death.
Altar*
He wont last long. Shit like that follows a person.
Wouldn't tsunderes have a really long bond time early on?  and then like an instant 6-10 bond.
Wait, so that H610 Pro V2 is available now?  The link you supplied says it's $55 + $15 (total $70) for me.  Here in the UK that equates to about £53, which is actually cheaper than some of the ones I listed above.  I might as well get that, right?  But I'll have to buy it quick because I don't think the sale will last much longer. I'm thinking even if I don't "need" tilt, I might as well get it if I can for the price it is currently at.
I think it definitely made more sense on paper from a business standpoint to trade deGrom, Matz and Wheeler.  Probably even Thor too and go for the full rebuild.  But I'm glad they didn't and I'm also glad they didn't just trade a couple of them.  Those guys have been together for so long now breaking them up would suck.  Yea the Mets are a joke, the Wilpons suck, the roster is perennially injured, but you don't hear a bunch of shit about our clubhouse falling apart.  Shoulda tried to get something for Bautista and Mesoraco, but it wouldn't have been much anyway.  At least I still have deGrom and Syndergaard starts to look forward to.
"I pay f2p for games I actually enjoy"  &gt;refuses to spend money on warframe  Okay so then you don't enjoy it.  Also, if you find issue with the fundamental income premise of the game and feel it pressures you unfairly then stop playing.
Thanks!
news  n(y)o͞oz/  noun  newly received or noteworthy information, especially about recent or important events.  "I've got some good news for you"  a broadcast or published report of news.  plural noun: the news  "he was back in the news again"  synonyms:report, announcement, story, account; More  informal  information not previously known to someone.  "this was hardly news to her"
Reading all the outrage is hilarious especially since he didn't say this. Ya'll live for his crazy antics what would you even talk about without him.
The real question is how are you talking to dj Kahled's never born daughter Ally Kahled?
They're soulless abominations onto THE LORD, duh
Potentially scale are they bugs? 
Sick burn
These people are fucking retarded.  Of course Einstein thought socialism was great.  He was living in Germany at the turn of the 20th century, when socialism was still just a nice theory of how to move away from an overbearing Prussian monarchy.  He died in the mid 50's, before Stalin and Beria and Mao and Pol Pot and Kim and Ho Chi Minh and Castro killed 100 million people proving that humans can't make it work without being forced to do so by men with guns.
Any word on how long the beta will last? Weekend I assume?
I'm saying they're are concealing "weapons" that go against their policy but aren't really going to do anything. They aren't trying to smuggle guns and swords and bombs, but smaller items. The point was to be hard to detect to expose loopholes and blind spots.   I'm no authority on this matter. But do you think the TSA and the DHS would release this information if there were lapses in security? They redact all kinds of pointless stuff citing "national security." Why wouldn't they keep these tests internal and secret as to not alert potential bad guys of loop holes???
Yes summited. Start early (3am from the lake) and wear a helmet! Saw probably 2 dozen people this weekend on the peak without helmets. 3 huge rockfall events happened on the peak while I was on it, keep your head on a swivel.
Historians don't really categorize whether things are in living memory or not. I'd say people generally say "within living memory" when they happened while old but not crazy old people were alive. 
"No, I got here just the other day."
&gt; Is it not the equivalent of an ad-hominem attack?  No, you fucking retard.  &gt; chose to simply attack the source itself.  Which is completely legitimate.  Ad hominem is when you try to discredit someone by attacking them personally *on unrelated grounds*.  I can call you an idiot because your ideas and sources are bad.  It's only ad hominem if I base my argument against your ideas *on personal attacks against you*.  There's nothing wrong with criticizing a source for being low quality and biased.
The hash slinging slasher!
And every time you say it I will agree with you very much.
He falsely complained about KDB being lazy as well, so I would definitely take his word with a grain of salt
Nice!
For sure!! Happy teaching friend :&gt;
I just wanted to see if anyone in SoCal has tried any of these out yet.
Let me access a debug mode. I'll point out the most notorious face smashing ledges and we'll have this knocked out by week's end.
Is it having a seizure?
Anyone know what the legal reprocussions for something lie this would be? 
&gt;but he can't accept that his job-hunting experience is out of date and things don't work the same way anymore.  Yes! My parents were always on me about not "getting off my ass and looking" when I was younger. Mom, applications are done online now..  They also always pressed me to call them a week after I sent in the application and to continue calling every few days. No, that's annoying. Employers don't want to be annoyed by me when I don't even work for them yet
Bongino
I'm not actively trying to lose weight, no, and as I've gotten a couple of comments like this, I'll address it: I do have a medical condition, and gaining weight is much harder for me than for most people so I run rather skinny, but I'm regularly monitored by a doctor and everything is more or less fine. I'm actually quite insecure about being so thin, and that's part of why I've been posting here: to lift my spirits.
Not sure. He's out of country and I haven't been able to reach him. He'll be excited to see this blew up. 
tru that
De är redan 400 år... Och har nog förvarats sämre än de senaste 10 åren...
and a contract, don't forget that part!
I can tell you from professional experience that this is terrible terrible advice....your just adding more negative scary voices to a dog who is already seeing the situation a negative. 
You launder $4.5 Billion 
No. We were actually friends for about 20 years before. For her to do that kind of ended the friendship.  I would've been totally okay with her saying "nah I don't see you that way" when I asked her out. But for her to say yes and not show up... fuck that. Even as just a friend, I deserve better.
i know
Marvel lives &lt;3
Your snap number is 78902. You are the snap buddy of u/Riot_Rainslight. Your snap number is half of u/Riot_Rainslight's snap number (39452). Perfectly balanced.
Would be nice if GW provided official rules for 750/1500 (number of battle lines, etc). My local GW seems to only play 750 or 1500!
This thread is a shitshow. To me, it's unnecessary and overkill, just like an actual HH. There is no need to give that to everyone in mod rotations over the next month. There is nothing really to gain from it from GGG's perspective.   These leagues alone aren't worth it for me to play because it skews how I want the content to be and it's too damn close to the next league to want to do the whole Trial bullshit, map progression and gear acquisition twice. 
Oh hahaha my bad 
It’s hard for me to not wear dramatic lashes. Even though the dramatic ones tend to be more expensive, they’re also sturdier in my opinion. They last me a long longer than some of the light wispy pairs I’ve owned.  
It's funny because you have no idea what Facism means. 
I'm stealing your suggestion to your friend!
I was going to post until I read this one, you hit pretty much every drink I was thinking.
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
I laughed when the Ladder seemed to work as a Wombat shield. 
G
Kenan plays the same character in every sketch. I can totally believe it’s taken this long. 
Yes, my guess is that he's both plain-looking and racist. 
Probably to stop anything negative from being said about him, as Tencent is a large Chinese company
&gt;isn't it more work to make the text black?
I WISH I WAS HIGH ON POTENUSE 
Have you used any program to create a keyboard macro or remap any of the keys?
Sure, though only a few of them have ps4, and out of the ones that do, only a couple play regularly. 
I was thinking about calling my local Tesla office tomorrow and asking them if it was possible for them to give me a call when my Model 3 arrives off the truck...   Think they would do that? 
That's what I initially thought but I didn't want to come off as desperate. 
Where did you see that at?
He knew she would enforce sanctions and if there was no response she might introduce new ones. I don’t think she viewed Putin/Russia as an friend/ally to the US.
I already explained it. "it just allows Haki Users to attack people despite their unnatural bodies". I didn't say logia, I said unnatural. It doesn't make Luffy's body not rubber, but it damages him *despite* the fact that he is rubber.
Don't forget to bring a snack while you're down that rabbit hole.
Someone literally said “The Hive is actually making Level 6 closer, now the paranoia is gone”  Like they didn’t say this exact statement when Winston was evicted 
Every single school district I work with has BYOD policy and doesn’t filter or block anything except porn.  “Removing the device from the child’s hand teaches them nothing on how to use it responsibly.” Was what a superintendent told me once when I asked about the policy. Pretty solid logic IMO
Oky. Y porque preguntas my race? Dude
https://imgur.com/a/gCZa1yR
It is used heavily in the animation and visual effects industries.
Thanks so much! The joke was the character I play is almost always happy so it makes it look like the comment made him very upset :)
Looks like Detroit
THE YOUNGLINGS WERE TRAGEDY ACTORS
Agreed, BLACK_MILF_ANAL. 
over his last 10 games before going back on the DL it was like .683 or something. it was bad
I had to confirm my purchase through an email i got from the credit card company. I tried to use my bank card but that wouldnt work.
Because this would be removed from /r/starwars.
The world would look beautiful. 
Your [text post](https://www.reddit.com/r/CryptoCurrency/comments/93juxj/the_failure_of_bcash_fork_in_pics/) was removed for not having a high enough character count and therefore violating rule II. Please resubmit as a comment in the daily thread or submit a new post with at least 215 characters.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/CryptoCurrency) if you have any questions or concerns.*
A hideously average body of a 40 year old man who's let himself go in recent years
The former.  Getting caught while trying to switch between high/low block is most likely because you're not doing it fast enough. Even if it feels like you are, you might be a few frames too slow. Especially online, where you have to account for frame delay. It can also happen if you're trying to go from crouching to standing and accidentally hit up-back.  Getting caught coming down from the air usually happens because the defending player is already holding down-back, but the attacking player is still airborne. So the defender hits the ground, immediately crouch blocks, and gets clipped by the overhead before the attacker lands. Or they're holding up-back and getting hit during pre-jump frames.
Something Awful’s Photoshop Friday had these a lot too. 
TY!
Absolutely predictable. I'm more surprised it wasn't included in his first address a Premier...
I noticed. I'm pretty positive they weren't shown as being needed before on Muthead, but oh well, I realize this now.
This is liiiiit!!! 
I think you win this one :-))
Keep pestering whoever shipped it. I had something similar happen but the "delivered" status was for when it reached my local post office? Not my actual house which was weird. I mean it eventually showed up, but it sounds like that's not your case. Is it just Sephora? Could someone be taking your packages?
Butt-Fuckingly Good
I think the recipes have to get approved. I reposted it because it got deleted after a few hours yesterday because the title was apparently too long. I had to message the moderators to find out what was even happening.  ¯\_(ツ)_/¯
Our flair 
Page Text is reproduced below:  *****  Some of you might have noticed Steam Achievements being gradually added in the last few days... Now they are fully implemented and are ready to be earned!  Hope you enjoy them!   ... also, some minor bug fixes:  Under some circumstances it was possible to repeatedly throw all types of grenades even when not having enough APs to do so. Great fun for the one that does the throwing, not so much for the one receiving the blasts...   *****  Bot created to announce Steam News automatically, powered by [SteamKiwi.com](http://steamkiwi.com). If you are a moderator and wish to request this bot to post news to your subreddit, or stop posting to your subreddit please PM /u/etaew.
Didn’t look that close his eyes where wide open 
Waterfalls don't blow with the wind.  Literally unplayable
... the elderfints in philly aren't there anymore? :( 
Not a problem, no offense taken. Let’s take it from the top  *OBVIOUS SPOILERS AHEAD*  When asked to introduce yourself, ask “why”  When asking Misha and Shizune questions, choose the non option of “ask about her deafness” (it’s the only one that doesn’t gain any points)  When playing Shizune in RISK, play defensively  When you first meet Hanako, shove your foot in your mouth and loudly introduce yourself. Don’t apologize   When talking to Kenji, say Hanako “wasn’t cute”  It doesn’t really matter what you tell the Nurse, but the safe answer is to say “maybe” when asked to work out  In The Lilly/Shizune argument, side with Lilly by saying “cut her some slack”  When running with Emi, do not push yourself, take it easy  When walking back to Yamaku with Rin and Lilly, say that “I’m in bad shape”  And Finally, when asked about Rin, say that “I’m interested in the art club”  And you should get Rin’s route 
Having a baby isn't real until Titus Oneal tells you you're having a baby.
Speak for yourself. Lynels still scare the shit out of me, especially gold ones
Their treatment plan, their disposition, their likely outcomes, why your prophylaxis management is what it is, why your fluids are what they are, why your vent settings are what they are, what the labs mean, what the vitals mean, why this antibiotic, why this dose for this medication, it goes on  Seeing a change in a patient's status first isn't knowing the patient. That's simple observation.
HmMmMmMMmMmmMmmmMmMMMMmMm
We're always forgotten.  Man can't I just go back to rebuild the Peak of Serenity and chill?
Yes.  This is factually correct.  They work 30% more hours on average.
Well, unfortunately we don't know anything about the location or circumstances so all we can do is speculate. I wouldn't drink it though. 
I'm reading this as a lot of revisionism as well.
Yeah, I was gonna point that out. It can get like reverse tertis in some places.
Less cynically, probably 80% of TO is also opposed to this change being forced on them.
Words alone can not express my disgust for that piece of shit. Those damning words from his own family do a pretty good job however.
https://i.redditmedia.com/PyH1Uk2kMPDpwwIKYEfwSsv2x0K4gWPAAcB1JxVLRhc.jpg?w=599&amp;s=62f2405f89b3482e6bf1af67868a0441
IKR? I don't even want to think about the hiatus.
It's only an issue for group missions. All others have a -pl18 limit which is fine unless their bringing pathfinders (don't do this of you're underleveled).  Edit: apparently it's broken and low levels can team up to get into high lvl missions.  Ridiculous. 
Looks like a grazer of some sort due to the flat, wavy chewing surface. Nebraska had a major extinction event, so it could be one of a number of species! You would need to show where you found it and find the age of the rocks in the area. 
Just curious does "radical fucking dumbass neo-nazi piece of shit brigade" include everyone who voted for Trump?  A civil war in the USA would be just awful but the more people there are that think like you the sooner it would be over.  One of the first rules of war is to know your enemy and you appear to me to be very, very out of touch.
I'm like right next to you!
This sub is full of people who have nothing to do with programming 🤷‍♂️
its very convenient if you  didnt charge your car the night before.. 10 minutes at the dc charger you are good to go.. its something you wont regret paying extra for.  but if the car doesnt have it, you wont be able to go on longer trips in the future.  
Yeah you're right star citizen should have been finished 5 years ago right? I'm sure it would have been a nice hangar game.
Honestly at this point Tia needs to love herself more because damn woman you need to upgrade your taste. 
What about the speededition from hyperx is it really faster than the normal fury s ?
Yeah I thought I'd see if sorting it out with better hygiene would work. I brush twice a day, but I heard more than that is more harmful than it is helpful. Don't know how true that is.  Don't know if asthma has anything to do with breath but it's been acting up for the just few days.  Anyways, thanks! 
You were the Eastern Conference Champions.
1.  You compare the idea that Tesla is overvalued to [the earth being flat](https://www.reddit.com/r/teslamotors/comments/8y19r7/former_tesla_employee_blasted_by_elon_musk_takes/e27lg6v/), so your definition of "fudster" is incredibly questionable to say the least.  2.  For all the complaining you do about shorts selling their position, I have yet to see a single complaint about all the longs selling their position.  It's not about anyone selling their position, you just don't want to hear anything that goes against your narrative.  This isn't a safe space for you to just hear whatever opinion you want to hear.
Use an Animation Blueprint to drive the logic of which animations to play and handle blending. Try searching the documentation or YouTube for examples of how to set one up. You'll also need to make sure the character knows to use the animation BP after you make it.
Malazon has a Deck that is pretty important, involving powerful figures and gods.
But the thing is, if a whale is gonna whale for a specific character. Then they're gonna spend money on said character regardless if it's a limited time gacha. They'll just keep throwing money at the current banner until they get what they want. On top of that, if they only wanted one specific character, Then they'd just spend on their individual.   I mean I understand the logic. But the movie characters not being in the premium pool doesn't really change if someone is gonna whale. It just means those characters will be featured in fillers a bit more often. And say if I wanted to go ham to get Senna, then I'd just do it the next banner she's in regardless of being limited time or not
Maybe earplugs. I’ve considered it for a few other things too. I’m afraid the fear is in there now so we’re just going to give it a rest and revisit it later. The more I try to help the issue the worse it seems to get. 
This guy in primary school had a big hatred for me because he says I was the reason he missed being there when his baby sister was born  The reason was because he decided to come to my birthday party and his baby sister just so happened to be born on that very same day and he bullied me for years over this.  If anything I at least admire the love and care he had for her but this was a bit much 
And there's no water combat
I never said the US was the greatest country in the world, I don't even know how you could measure such a thing, every country has issues, and I'm sure you don't like the issues Austria has just as much as I dislike the ones in the US. I just don't see how shitting on the people that live here, when most of us don't like what we're going through either, is going to do any good. 
Nah that’s probably right between the cigarettes, vaping, and pot smoking.
Same, if Brett is safe I want to see him get HOH 
ah... where to start! 
Curse of the Salino
I had no idea.  This blows my mind. 
Chain immigration takes decades.  Immigrants use less benefits than natural born citizens.  The immigration system is broken because we don't make it easier to get in. There is demand for workers, the workers have a hard time getting in, the workers break the rules. It's really capitalism's fault, which is why unnatural immigration law is profoundly anti-capitalist. 
I chose the Colts because they are no longer in the AFC East. Makes an easy touchstone on how crazy this is.
Probably because you're not socializing and establishing or joining a fireteam and instead relying on chance to link up with someone who is actually going to be good, even though the people who are good are probably not wanting to chance getting linked up with AFK or shit players so they either establish or join a fireteam with people who are likeminded.... 
I feel like a lot of people don’t get
To be fair a lot of stupid people would also make that same statement. 
I've been playing Grid lately, figured I'd get Grid2 and Dirt Rally for cheap. Does Grid2 have split-screen?
Like his name and such?
yeah i dont get the hate for pewdiepie on the left it was only like 1 or 2 heated gaming moments 
neato burrito doubt ill win but goodluck to all!
Can we get a explination on what it takes for something to get push notifided?
Okay, now THIS is Communism.
We have a $6/month account at Repository Hosting for Subversion and Trac (bug tracking). They support git now too. 
SemiAmusingBot says: I am now installed on a VPS. reply #3 test
Edgy in what way?   Give an edgy example from your book.
I haven't worked directly with him so I can't say. 
If they’re a farmer where the fuck are they getting their income from? Are they just self-sufficient and not selling to mandi at all? How do they have ration card?   Actually fuck it.   How the hell do you think voting happens here? How is that person going to vote if he has no ID, no birth certificate, no aadhar, no ration card, nothing? Doss this farmer have kids? How does he send them to school? Don’t say Madrasa.   How are you people spewing pure garbage like this?
IMO those are the top 3 episodes of Buffy though
Maybe it’s nostalgia that’s subliminally making you believe it’s better than it is now... But then again graduation and 808s were fucking great albums
Yes. I said did you get home safe? Thanks for meeting, had a great time. Maybe after you get back from vacation we could do something again?  She said - yes I got home safe and I had a nice time as well.
&gt; The project has a fast compile time, so don't expect to be compiling all night.  Which is a surprise for a C++ project.  Kidding aside, thanks for reminding me about this one. I think I keep conflating it with a closed-source SaaS 3D tool for some reason.
Nothing done "behind the scenes" deserves him any casting time. If he's going for whatever imaginary behind the scenes stuff you're making up, fine. But if you want to cast TI, you should have to, ya know, actually cast the rest of the year like everyone else. But you're too busy choking his dong down to think
If you wanna know more without scouring the internet or tracking down dozens of comics I suggest this youtube channel.  https://m.youtube.com/channel/UCKxQmKgrkUv4S7P5w0pLayw  He's got a whole series on a couple venom runs. As well as a number of other Marvel, DC, and other comics.
Two more weeks until we wait 6-8 months for S6
More airflow is never a bad thing.  Both cases you listed include one fan in the rear.  Adding one or two fans to the front to draw in fresh air will set up airflow from front to back.
Okex is a shitty exchange. Huobi only allows 3x gearing max
&gt;The moon landing was faked (at least partly)  How the hell do you partly land on a moon?!
You’ve been here for a month, the power of Reddit is strong.
it also has a sliding hook on the end of it.
https://drive.google.com/file/d/1doSWgHMvu4Ya-naONJ6EOiBmEQ_snDJI/view
Best cure for a hangover 😚
https://2static.fjcdn.com/pictures/Uh+i+guess_a91589_6068509.jpg  lmao, you do you man. i aint the one not getting laid and being a whiny ass toxic bitch lol
What's your secret? My sister gets nosebleeds all the time, my dad does too, so I suppose for her it's genetics 
Out of the 865 people in my graduating class, less than half could read at a 12th grade level. 20% could not read above a 3rd grade level.
I'd say 4 days. 9-10 pages a 10 is pretty common for Murata if he's going ham, which he usually does towards the end.  Also, if he releases it on Friday it'll be exactly 6 weeks since the last chapter. I don't know why this is significant but yeah.
Okay offense, start working counts and getting on base. This game isn't over
Don't have any showings and not expecting it to work anyway. I'll keep moving on with Sinemia. It has become official now 
Yeah that could defiantly be it and it also contrast well as a summary of the the redditor who is Bi-polar and analyzed the album.
Marisha said she almost made Keyleth take Barbarian levels, (until Kerrek showed up and helped her through some shit) so it might not be the real opposite, though I now wonder what lines she says for her.
Thank you. 
I’d like to take a moment to appreciate the use of the word “moxie”. A+ word choice.
you seem to of tried alot of Mom's which in your opinion is the best?
That was the most real thing anyone not named Jordan said last night.
Dix del niñe*
Damn, I came here hoping for help on how to \*kill them not how to spawn them haha. I'm pretty sure I've run into this before too and had to restart AND leave the area (and pay the eridium again) to get them to spawn again. I'm also on PS4. PM me if you want to try to tackle together. Not sure how much help I would be since I've never solo'd them though.  I have OP8 cat Maya and melee Krieg (who would probably be useless against them) as well as lvl 72 Sal, Maya, &amp; Zero
One user can get multiple matches.
Lmao this faggot nigger thinks Obama actually had class
added
Sorry about that :-)
That’s what I thought but the other ones that don’t exist all just say something like “not found”
If you're like most people your fighter is your primary exploration ship. You warp between systems in it, and you get jumped while traveling in it between systems and planets . You have to be able to survive anything in this ship. It should be a killing machine with Max weapons high defense and maneuverability.  With max general sots your fighter should still have adequate storage.. call your freighter in if you have to transfer any overflow. Your freighter should be following you like a dog anyway.  Even if you are on planet you can call it directly overhead.  Your exotic should be pure beast. Don't even waste space on the hyperdrive tech. It shouldn't even leave the freighter unless you expect trouble. Use it for capital ship battles and in dangerous areas prone to pirate activity. Save before leaving the freighter in this thing.
The black one isn’t terrible it just looks awkward on her. It needs to be hemmed shorter to look nicer.
I’m from Texas too. I’m about to start college and I’m scared out of my mind.. I’m only 18.. I turned last month.   I really like video games too. I have ps4, Xbox one and PC.  I want a friend to laugh with too.  Someone who can distract me from things and someone to talk to.   I’m moving to another state in two weeks. You seem really nice, I’d love to be friends.  Also , music is life. I love music so much.   If anyone else wants to pm me then please do. I don’t have many friends and I need people to talk to. 
[Spolier](/s "Haven't  someone read raw and said that rias lost")
Hey now, there's no need for such coarse language! Please use the word 'negro', which has historically been the respectful term for chocolate Americans.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/CringeAnarchy) if you have any questions or concerns.*
floortje bunschoten
I agree, I think a rare candy version would be much better though.
[Just close the damn site.] (https://giphy.com/gifs/lilyachty-lil-yachty-3og0IBdxsxb9zVNedW/fullscreen)
Sounds like a cover-up.
winner!
nevermind- I just saw that they are different! 
Valve using promocode bsj. 
BoJack Horseman is one of my top favorites! Maybe you will enjoy it too!!! Also I watched Final Space few days ago and I cannot wait for the 2. Season to come out
They really need to cut down on ignite and electrocute its becoming way too obnoxious to play against.
⠀
  Snapshots:  1. *This Post* - [archive.org](https://web.archive.org/20180801000008/http://www.reddit.com/r/greatawakening/), [_megalodon.jp\*_](http://megalodon.jp/pc/get_simple/decide?url=http://www.reddit.com/r/greatawakening/ "could not auto-archive; click to resubmit it!"), [removeddit.com](https://www.removeddit.com/r/greatawakening/), [archive.is](http://archive.is/MkOuF)  *^(I am a bot.) ^\([*Info*](/r/SnapshillBot) ^/ ^[*Contact*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot))*
Roadtrip! 
I've voted in every election since 2000, and have only voted for a Republican once: Bob McDonell for governor of Virginia, primarily because he repeatedly promised to allow private liquor stores. I've voted for one Democrat, also: Jim Webb for Senate in 2006. In all other races, I've voted for the Libertarian Party candidate (usually for statewide and Federal offices) or for independent candidates (usually in local races).
Why are filmmakers so damn lazy. Original films are basically nonexistent. Everything has to be a remake, prequel, or sequel. Lame 
Please use standard format: https://www.google.com/amp/s/www.wallstreetoasis.com/forums/investment-banking-resume-template%3famp
How to deal with jayce ? I feel like I can't do anything. If I try to make an aggressive move, he ends up destroying me in one combo (-30% hp left on me). On the other hand, if I dont make any moves, he just pokes me down till I need to recall. What materies should I run ? Is it possible to use ignite to kill him, or is tp a lot more safer ?  I've never actually won vs a jayce, but I recently hit D3 and now the match up is harder than ever, he destroys me.
Here we go! Viewer base decreases 20% this episode from production created conundrums
I do! Haha
I don't know but today seems kind of odd
Out of curiosity, is there a mercy rule in baseball?
Right in the feels
Its a sash.
Feedback for /u/Godzilla_1954
I seem to remember Yoda saying that size doesn’t matter when it comes to the force 
https://www.reddit.com/r/lordoftherings/comments/93juqt/in_honor_of_ucatfinsoup_drawing/?st=JKAD6T86&amp;sh=966c58c5
Does anyone know how to say the entire thing in Japanese? From "Nothing I've done" to "Lemillion" 
Second floor? Where? Thanks 
That was a fun project. Possibly one I might eventually start up again. It was possible due to the hour lunch I used to get at my last job (a little less demanding) but recently I have been unable to find a lot of free time during the day.
Can confirm 
QBASIC!  Haven't thought of this in years!  You can't really blame schools for teaching this because it DID come with pretty much every Microsoft OS up to like ME so the cost was right.   This is making me remember the BASIC interpreter I'd play with on those old green screen Apple IIe machines.  Good times.
Do some cosplayers get plastic surgery to more closely resemble actors?  I have seen a few cosplayers who "look more like actress X than actress X."  And I figure a lot of plastic surgeons get asked: "make me look like actress Y."
Damn 😍
Don't get me wrong, I like Eugene but Mr. Krabs would make this guy his bitch
Yum yum! I wanna squirt on that tummy.
It's only the beginning of year two. I'm fine with them taking someone they like to contribute later. Colbert was a mediocre 7th, remember.  I'm looking for 5 more rings, not an all-in second year playoff run (*coughRamscough*) that screws us down the line  Edit: Also, I keep having to tell myself they are NOT Baalke, and thinking they're smarter than the rest of the league and can get something for nothing every damn time
But conspiracy is the crime. By happen stance they're obviously colluding but you can only be charged with conspiracy
Yet here you are... clearly someone cares. It also clearly discusses hockey. Last I checked this was r/hockey.
Then...what's the problem? Just that he could not get it cheap?  If so...so what? Other people are entitled to good deals to. Steam sales never rely on inventory. Get a PC. 
Nice edit, lol. This season has been 50% "Florida Sucks Dick" posts so I'll let you guys have this one. See you in Jacksonville. 
I swear people act like Tatum averaged 26/8/8 in the postseason. Yes he was very good but the circle jerk is astounding. I would not take in the Top 5 in a redraft like this, I'd take Booker over him 10/10 times
So just keep on track and itll come pretty much?
Removing side molding, and then replacing bumpers. How the plastic looks is not much of a concern to me.
Makes it even better
Awesome! I like making friends with people who share the similar hate towards the OP. 
Oooh over 80% rate sweet
Both of you are kinda morons.  Bill signed into law the expansion of the executive powers to control immigration.  Bush started the whole tough on immigration trend.  Obama kept it up but also made concessions.  Trump went full balls to the wall “tough” on immigration.  There is a huge difference between how these past presidents have handled immigration when compared to trump.
Wait Fomorian is back? Right now? 
Removed - Your account is too new to post a link, please wait some time before posting again. This action is to prevent spam on the subreddit.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/ClashRoyale) if you have any questions or concerns.*
My wife and I are in a constant battle horde or alliance . I don’t want to be the bad guys this expansion 
. . . what?
I think I can remember that 8KX was planned as a limited edition for KS backers only. I also think that even 1180Ti (that is realistically around 6 - 8 months ahead) won't be sufficient for 8KX. Although current 1080Ti is barely good for 8K, 1180 is 25% better and 1180Ti will be hopefully 40 - 45% better than 1080Ti, you need something like twice the power of 1080Ti for 8KX.  IMHO, the 30 - 40% improvements the latest update is talking about may be something to do with the lower render requirements. Maybe there is no significant visual gain between rendering 4K comparing to 2560x1440 when you downscale/upscale it.
general tech support questions, of which I botched, but they hired me anyway, because I had a good voice. I'm not an engineer.  They really didn't care totally and the one in 08 for retail was a lot harder than the rehire.
I guess that's why agents will imminently arrive at your door to arrest you for criticizing the government?
Put that shit in a blender. 1 banana, milk, protein powder (chocolate flavor) and peanut butter. Best thing you’ll ever fucking drink.   However you should fucking get used to drinking protein shakes. 
I will take  Palace P3 Triferg  Size M  Vlone Friends Tee  size M
I'd get this service but I don't think I spend even that amount on movies each month.
I understand the Bewick's are endangered in my area. Hopeful I have some established in my own backyard 
She had to be shocked, as a normie 
I’ve heard it’s a solid OK taste wise, but it’s kind of stringy. I’d definitely try it. I’d cook it in a pit, like how you do traditional barbacoa. 
I don't think until I was about 40 that it became easier.  I was never giving woman a challenge just letting them know that it wasn't them, it was me.  Mostly it was me not relaxing and having a hard time giving up control which I've learned to do.  As with many things, it's a conversation with the guy.  How he answers lets you know what kind of person he is. 
My engine works but the driveshaft is busted.
Booked.  $40 Sipe
What city you guys working out of?  That seems like a lot of listings to carry at one time. S/he's a Beast!
I was originally going to specify the date of death as tomorrow but this makes me really glad I didn’t.  I love it!   The twist was well executed and validating the daughter’s cause of death was a great touch.
Elite!
[I can't resist to myself!](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=V856p0yjfEA)
Aurelian Smol.
What do you guys use for bin bags? Genuinely curious...  Edit : so... The carbon footprint is uneffected  Because everyone is buying bin liners
They cited Norman Finkelstein as evidence.
Wait... what?
I can handle shopping for myself (probably because I personally have fun buying ridiculous and delicious things), but it's the heavy bags of dog food I can't quite handle. Chewy.com to the rescue, and then you can subscribe instead of remembering when you need to re-up. It's magical, I say!
I love fallout new vegas with that big mountain dlc because the stealth suit will just randomly be like,  'initiating combat' and I'll freak out looking around everywhere. Then she says,  'just kidding'. Gets me every time too..
I'd cum watching him holding Dan Gilbert upside down by his ankles and shaking all the change out of his pockets.
So I forgot about that ice crown incident, that is  either disproving the illgynoth whisper is about sylvanas or an oversight in the lore thanks for the reminder! 
There was an interview with Idris Elba in which the interviewer asked something about his experiences as an African American actor. He replied "Well, I'm neither of those things".
"cracker" from what I understand was initially slang for whip cracker
Whoah. Bit rude there. Although since you have less than a page of comments, I'll assume you're some sort of troll. So, kindly, fuck off.
Not looking forward to playing vs this dude 
The Twitter comments section is fucking toxic.  The pedophile insults will never go away.
ITT: People who don't understand yield signs 
So true. Walgreens has been good about the online orders for me at least. But yeah I stalked them all Halloween since I knew they were getting Halloween Chase Pops and i wanted Freddy and Jason and when i went to the store I just missed then but bought the only Walgreens Ex Nightmare Before Xmas Pops instead. Looks like I'll be looking for Jason too. Honestly all I would need for Jasin is a pop of his MOM!!! Ultimate FT13 Pops lol
yeah a lot of these edits use the Mans Not Hot bit
Assuming any rate of return means they're not doing what I suggested. The fact that it's underfunded means they're really not doing what I suggested. Letting politicians decide what the rate of return will be, and letting them spend any extra is beyond stupid.   (I never understand teacher unions, and this is one reason why. Teacher unions don't like the people who always vote for no tax increases, but this issue could bring them together. When politicians voted for this stupidity, why didn't the unions go to those people with their concerns? Seems like that was a huge missed opportunity).
Remember me~
How about "They've been saying it since Nancy Pelosi was lucid."
Pics, or it didn't happen.
I got that too a few months ago. It is pretty awesome.
Spend a few years doing bodybuilding as a natty and then come back here and I bet you will have changed your tune.  You ain't getting a physique like him, especially when training MMA full time, without juice
I can see why. Damn sure would love to feel them wrapped around me. Especially around my head.
My sister quit her 10 year job in the military and cashed out her pension to use as seed money to move to a Northerly boondocks town and open a thrift store. The store opened on July 14th and so far it's going gangbusters. Me and my folks are super proud (and relieved).
Always be willing to learn. Never be afraid to admit you don't know something. Everybody knows something you don't know yet. Don't truck other people into doing something for you because you don't know how to do it... Instead ask them to show you how. Don't be a know it all. And DON'T PUT DOCTORS ON A PEDESTAL. We're all there to work together. If you need to ask or tell a doctor something, do it. They're just people and most of them are friendly and professional at least. 
Those Nets jerseys are clean af, I think anyone can pull them off 
mate IDK what universe you think git gud means paying 3k $ you want to git gud, you play with no mods and get 1st, buying a toon no one has doesen't make you gud it makes you lame and you should be ashamed of yourself if you do that because it lacks emotions and education, git smart my friend, you play against CG for crystals not against your fellow players 
a masterpiece in the making.
why does this look like the death stranding trailer?
Did you read any of my other comments?
Sounds like someone is a bit sensitive today....
This is beautiful.
I think about this a lot, especially when I hear someone say they're "born to be a mom." Like, really? I respect that parenthood is a legitimate desire for many people but boiling down your entire existence to just being a vehicle for someone else's? That just sounds fucking bleak. Have some worth before you transfer all of your potential to another being.
I like your name. Must get good cell service... It's 5 G's.
well that main event will knock your sock off.
Just the bothersome ones ;)
not even going to bother. you are debating with me purely based on assumptions, which, truly , is stupid. plus, do not call me intellectually-lacking if you use 'its' instead of 'it's'. you are litterally what I imagine 99% of reddit to be in real life.
Prepare to have your face blown off
skype is dead, we are safe 
That's great parenting
&gt; 1_¿Cuanto cuesta el traslado de fetos?  El contrato no aclara que no se puedan llevar fetos, vacío legal, así que serían 30pe  &gt; 2_¿Te cruzaste a Norman Reedus en alguno de tus viajes?  No entendí la relación
Why are you the way that you are
Generally speaking, I'm not happy to put basically any of those cards in my deck. The first dagger spray is always good, and I'll usually take the first flying knee or sucker punch so I can fight act 1 elites. After act 1, I don't think any of those are cards you want in your deck outside of weird corner cases.   Blade dance is trash damage-wise, as are all of the common silent attacks. That's not how silent wins games, at least not on A15. And if you're talking non-ascension, you can win just by playing well and it doesn't really matter what you draft. 
Yeah I’m in v1
I'm sorry that you had to find out that you were a nerd this way
You're adding fuel to the fire. Just completely cut these people out of your life for good. Don't play these stupid games.
Honestly..! That particular mortal is resilient.. He saw sense in the end but what a fight he put up.. it's just a little necromancy..
Yowza I so instantly decided to save based on her facial expression I hadn't looked at the feet yet
Modern Family jobbed out to Miz and Mrs.
godless poost
Being a Dad to Aero (and his brother Finn) is the goddamn best thing ever. 
Except for one time where I was *just* pulling up to my nightclub and a player off the radar killed me and took the cargo. That one stung. :( 
[5005406-1: Ninjago Movie Play &amp; Display Case](https://brickset.com/sets/5005406-1) [[Photo]](https://images.brickset.com/sets/images/5005406-1.jpg) 
That doesn’t work anymore
Yeah with regard to meat, it's so controversial to have opinions on that and everyone is different.  I eat a primarily plant based diet with a lot of fruits, vegetables, whole grains, nuts, and seeds, but I definitely notice feeling stronger when my diet has a little bit of meat in it, especially fish and red meat 1-2x a week (to prioritize heme iron absorption).  I don't eat a ton of dairy beyond hard cheese and butter due to lactose intolerance. I go whole days without animal products and definitely keep the portions small with meat (1 small steak is 2 meals for me), but I tend to recover better with a little bit of omnivory.  I'm also a 112 lb woman, so obviously my nutritional needs are going to be different from yours.  With regard to the blood work, just any time something is off, it's not a bad idea, you know?  If there's anything weird going on with your body autoimmune wise or nutrient absorption wise, physically stressing it with marathon training is only going to exacerbate things.
Studying economics I see
Did you get them to switch before leaving?
Only issue I got is Idaho being mountaineers while West Virginia is the flying squirrels As a WVU alum, ouch 
Can you don't like that? I still got 30 minutes before sentencing ok. I buy breakfast then I go in. :'(
Sounds like a defrost issue. How long was it running when you took that picture? From the picture you posted there’s a full frost pattern shown so you don’t need to worry about anything with the sealed system. An issue with the operating thermostat would have symptoms like staying on too long, freezing food/shutting off completely for long periods of time. To test that your defrost circuit operates correctly make sure it’s been running at least several hours. Take a flat head screw driver and on the bottom of the temperature control knob area there’s a hole where the defrost timer can be turned. You’ll know it when you see it. Turn it until you hear a click and when the fan and compressor turns off it is now in defrost. After about 5-15 mins open the freezer for awhile and listen for hissing noises. If you hear the freezer section hissing we know that the defrost circuit is good and the defrost timer that controls it is bad. If you don’t hear the freezer section hissing then most likely the defrost bimetal is bad, or possibly the heater. 
No, I believe you have to create a new, Japanese account on Amazon JP. The shipping isn't too bad as I stated in another comment.  I believe you just select the currency and make sure you select that it will be for an overseas delivery, because I had a bit of difficulty entering my address otherwise lol  Its pretty straightforward :)
Ye Olde Patch &amp; Paint
It HAS to be mixed for it to help me because either on their own will just make it worse. I get mine from Amazon and use them i  a cool mist diffuser in my room.   I totally understand if they don't work for you and I can't stand it when someone who doesn't suffer from migraines tries to tell me I should try this or that. "Dude, I have a neurologist who is a migraine specialist.  He is probably one of the best in the state, he is definitely the top one in our area but I'm sure that article you read in Woman's World knows more that him."/s
Dropped the lens off at Canon yesterday and got an email today that it's ready to be picked up. The barrel part of the zoom was slightly loose in the outer housing and the tech said they see it all the time, and that even a little wiggle is too much. Nice to have a Canon Professional Services walk in desk 20 miles away. Thanks again for nudging me to take it in!
To not sugarcoat it he basically raped me rougher and way more forcefully than he ever did before, only thing is he made sure I orgasmed first (because if a woman orgasms then she is satisfied and clearly enjoyed it ----&gt; sarcasm). I honestly did not try to fight him off that time mostly because I was freaking terrified. Thank you!
There is nothing aww about his dog, period.
r/woooosh
Definition of the word tax:  A tax is a **mandatory** financial charge or some other type of levy imposed upon a taxpayer  Thank you come again
Whatever buddy
I need sleep 😯
This actually dope and fits really well haha
I feel your pain. I’m 25 and just starting out, but most girls I talk to online eventually ask me about previous relationships and then suddenly they lose interest... I’ve managed to get some dates but as soon the conversation steers to that topic I seem to scare them away. Do we just lie about it....? 
I actually found that the item that I needed (chromatic metal) is actually sold in the galactic trade at the space station. Little bit expensive, but the blueprint needed to make more actually came in the damaged cache. 
*Therum can see a outline of a house, many different areas and special places a part of it.*  "Don't ruin anyone's time and I'll be okay with it. If you give anyone a bad time I'll kick you out and won't think twice about it."
I feel unlucky to have a wallet that ends in 'e'.  We've had b,c,d,f... Gimme that E baybeeee
I'm not able to watch, what was it?
You're clearly dumb if you don't think that theirs a massive child trafficking ring happening. They're put in power for that reason. Research "Ted Gunderson".   https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BplUD6kQYuU  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8b61iIQCapY  https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VTRDbLDqwoU
We don't judge here at reddit. Maybe he... Well... You know... 
Your kind left us a fungi here ... didn’t you? We need a map!
Multiple narcissists, consistently talking past one another.
Ottoman troops are still trash by the late game, though. Since you're Baguette, you should crush them if you took a couple of mil idea groups. 
That looks to be her, thanks!
What was he expecting thoughhhh oh my goshhh
Those lips 😍😍😍
Well I can see why they do it. There's a concern lower league attendances will suffer. I can see that argument, but if anything I think people watching the Premier League has gone down locally
Aww, that's really cool..  ...Wait, what?
Oef mijn fout, zal dit onthouden.
**IMPORTANT!!**  **Please** read [this announcement](https://www.reddit.com/r/dontdeadopeninside/comments/933ffh/overposted_images_true_ddoi_a_new_flair_a_new_bot/), and the [wiki page](https://www.reddit.com/r/dontdeadopeninside/wiki/post_types) to get a *clear* understanding of our classifications and rules before blindly voting. --- **Upvote** this comment if the post is **[True DDOI](https://www.reddit.com/r/dontdeadopeninside/wiki/post_types#wiki_type_1.3A_true_ddoi)**. *Downvote* this commment if it is not.  If this post needs moderator attention, please **report** it.  ---  If you want to talk about the subreddit, feel free to send us a message!  ^bot ^by ^jackson1442 ^| ^modified ^by ^umbresp ^| ^[faq](https://jackson1442.github.io/flairbot/#faq) ^| ^[source](https://github.com/jackson1442/redditBot) ^| ^action ^#[36774bc6cfb694](/r/ddoilogs/comments/93juy3/36774bc6cfb694_commented_on_post_today_happened/)
Mascara can grow bacteria that it picks up from your eye over time. Styes are caused by an infection in the eyelash follicle and surrounding glands. Why it's recommended to throw away mascara after 3 months. 
Just buff it till it's invisible
We were just saying it's a southern drink.
We got the internet, who needs golf!? /s
Trephining. Blows my mind
Having the choice in wearing sexual clothing is equality
It's a slog but fun. Color code your setup so you can assign damage by color, not numbers.  It's not good, but I really like three jumpmasters with crew, trick shot and rigged cargo chutes with a cloaked spacetug quad jumper.
I agree. Boogie is doing quite well for himself. I do believe the weight-loss surgery may affect his future income though. 
That is the tube check correct? Yes, I had a dye test done in February when my OBGYN was performing my laparoscopy for endometriosis diagnosis and excision/ablation. Tubes, ovaries, uterus all look healthy!
With all due respect, flake is holding up the SCOTUS nomination by not showing up to vote...at least for the time being.
dont worry it was just vaccinations you guys are cool with forcing those on people right? The left hates people for deciding they dont want vaccinations, but they love the unvaccinated illegal alien masses, a new group of people to pander to for their completely 100% illegal votes!  p.s. Trump is your president for 7 more years. 
Redditor  /u/alexiglesias007  has low  karma  in this subreddit.
Yeah I found the forsaken only one thanks, costs $60 AUD and the one that comes with the annual pass is $100
Coming from an American that does not know much about German architecture, do you know why Frankfurt had a bunch of skyscrapers built and other German cities didn't?
CAVA sitting in the corner with a box full of matches. 
We wouldn't do that. I don't feel it's right to do. 
Ok first of all go on degree works and see what science classes you can take beacuse physics is actually hard here otherwise CSCI, Math and Spanish require regular studying (assuming you are rusty).
A person with refined taste I see
Everyone likes ghirahim
No, not a crappy design. Maintenance issue.
Your problem is ping related
This is a really poor talking point to be honest. Regardless of how much you are taxed, unless 100%, you are still better off fiscally having worked more rather than less. The supposed 'disincentive' is just that a work life balance is given more of a value at higher income amounts.
108 billion - over 99 billion = around 8 billion  Do not eat at McDonald's or you will die like all the rest. Now I know what is in the secret sauce. Zykon-B!
https://www.mayoclinic.org/diseases-conditions/high-blood-cholesterol/in-depth/statin-side-effects/art-20046013
I suppose this design is a bit too 90's for the modern age too 
~~There will be a recession in 2016~~  ~~There will be a recession in 2017~~  ~~There will be a recession in 2018~~  There will be a recession in 2019
Oh shit just like Poland let Hitler commit genocide right? 
No wonder you have an army of pretentious neckbeard losers following you around  Snapshots:  1. *This Post* - [archive.org](https://web.archive.org/20180801000013/https://mobile.twitter.com/SaRaAshcraft/status/1021443491317022721), [_megalodon.jp\*_](http://megalodon.jp/pc/get_simple/decide?url=https://mobile.twitter.com/SaRaAshcraft/status/1021443491317022721 "could not auto-archive; click to resubmit it!"), [archive.is](https://archive.is/a0Wqt)  *^(I am a bot.) ^\([*Info*](/r/SnapshillBot) ^/ ^[*Contact*](/message/compose?to=\/r\/SnapshillBot))*
Ups for Dan The Automator!
Wow I read this as the baboon had lost his legs. I thought a legless Baboon did the job perfectly for 9 years now it's less impressive.
He's telling people to buy emerald gold to improve the site. That's all.
I would guess impatience
I don’t ever weigh it out, but definitely keep track based on the size of my vaporizer. I know it has a ~.1g chamber, so can estimate about how much I’m vaping. To me, the particular strain I use and the temperature I vape at have the biggest effect on my experiences, so I keep track of those very closely (in a journal). I’d be interested to hear how your smoking experiences changed if you monitored it by weight more closely though! 
You feel bad for us, but you're the one voluntarily going to see Mamma Mia. 
Hey, 3sides2everyStory, just a quick heads-up:   **fourty** is actually spelled **forty**. You can remember it by **begins with for-**.   Have a nice day!  ^^^^The ^^^^parent ^^^^commenter ^^^^can ^^^^reply ^^^^with ^^^^'delete' ^^^^to ^^^^delete ^^^^this ^^^^comment.
In Nelson I ride the footpath because the cycle lanes are full of ankle deep potholes and sections of them are literally patches of GRAVEL. Totes safe.
That probably wouldn't be good for business 
Probably a Klee Kai- but really- agree that it’s hard to tell. Klee Kai was created by mixing Huskies with smaller spitz breeds- and a Pomsky is a mix of a Husky with a ... smaller spitz breed.
[Here](http://www.conventionscene.com/tag/saw/)
Ah I understand. Thank you!  Confirmation that electricity will fuck my shit up if I don't know what I'm doing. And I don't.  Thank God for my father 😅
That's the point, if they die then boom, world is saved. At the moment it's a flawed but true point they had. They saved the world but Fitz also died.
Hi, this is a friendly reminder to flair your post with the appropriate platform. Thanks!  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/OverwatchLFT) if you have any questions or concerns.*
**PLEASE READ THIS MESSAGE IN ITS ENTIRETY BEFORE TAKING ACTION.**  Hi there! Your question has been removed as it looks like you're needing assistance of some sort which violates askreddit's [Rule 2](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_2-)   Any post with personal pronouns (I, my, mine) will not be approved. Try different wording.  **Please use one of these subreddits:**   * Need advice? /r/advice or /r/needadvice or /r/relationship_advice   * Cant remember something? /r/TipOfMyTongue * Looking for a particular subreddit? /r/findareddit.   Otherwise if these don't fit your needs, check out the [multireddits in our sidebar](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/about/sidebar) which cover almost every topic imaginable, thanks!  If you feel this was removed in error, please [contact the mods](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit&amp;subject=Help Related Post Review Request&amp;message=My post was removed for being help related, please review%3a%0d%0a%0d%0ahttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/93juyv/how_would_a_total_new_comer_get_into_the_mcu_and/). *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I would imagine it would be the same for cities or regions in France too wouldn’t it? We group all of the states together into one national average because it’s much more simple, though obviously specific parts within the group will vary from others.
Not so much
I like his “real talk” but I hate his arrogance. He thinks he is so enlightened. I hate when he disrespects his callers who have valid points but contradict his. I would love to have like 5 A’s fans in a row who all say “we demand to be taken seriously”... that would make my day.
Trump in two months: “I let Putin pay me in order to stress test our election system... believe me it was a HUGE favor to real AMERICANS... crooked Hillary wouldn’t have done that for you! SAD!”
Sure, but for a high handicapper it's a good way to get an idea of the tees they should play.  I play anywhere from 5800-6800, depending on who I'm playing with, when by the rule of 28 I should be playing 6700
1) I've heard that uber doesn't operate where she lives 2) Even if it did just to play your theory out: i'm certain that if she took an uber that night we would have heard about that by now unless it was on somebody else's account... there's a million things that aren't technically impossible but c'mon
Well if you were any good, you'd know that turning in coins involves turning in coins.  Any team with a brain will contest.  Then again, the last game I remember playing that map, I had 100 coins on me until I intentionally died in the enemy base (as we were destroying their core).  100 coins is the limit - you can't pick up any more.
Add a biscuit to that and you got one of my legit favorite meals 
My experience with essential oils have basically just been people telling me I should use them to help fix my hereditary autoimmune disease. I admit that I may be a bit biased against them, it's true.
No one knows any ways so its a win win
I've been thinking about doing this mod! Was it difficult? What tools did you need? (I've never modded pedals before)
AlexDaGod
We've all been there. There will be another pen, probably many. Hang tough friend
You’re getting downvotes because you’re admitting to driving in a dangerous way and acting like it’s no big deal. Deaf and Hearing impaired drivers are going to be more sensitive to emergency vehicle lights because lights are how a lot of things are communicated to them such as the doorbell, phone, fire alarm, baby monitor, etc. It may not have caused you to wreck yet but it is still dangerous and could cause you to miss important information on the road. 
its not
Nationals are winning the World Series this year. In 4 months we're gonna look back and laugh how much we overreacted over this team.
Mesh pro put like .12 coils in it
Fully expected this as the top post and it's way the hell down here. disappointed :(
Well, this is "in association with Marvel", which really just means they're using the name to promote the movie. It's a Sony movie not a Marvel one, which bodes badly for the quality. Say what you want about Marvel, they're the only ones doing superheroes with any sort of consistency. 
Not exactly the same but close: https://youtu.be/2gOqXTCOci8
Now this is what r/accidentalracism should be
fuckin huge lips kid
Are you linking this to Auburn or??? 
No, I meant as in are they dying outright? Slow decline? Live but never grow, etc. As far as temperature goes, I notice they're flowering now - end of July. When haworthiopsis is sposeda take a siesta. ¯\\\_(ツ)\_/¯
Mg we get it
This may be true for transfers between accounts at Ally (actually, those should be 'instant', so I don't know what you're referring to that's 24 hours. Cite reference please?) but it is not true for transfers to other banks. In those cases it's still three days since they're sending it through the Automated Clearing House (ACH). Any bank using the ACH will take at least 2-3 business days for the transfer.
Fun fact:  All black people receive the message seen at the bottom at least 5 times a day.
We are? She literally just burned an entire city/civilization to the ground filled with innocents cause she wanted to prove a point, how do you come back from that? It is so much worse than almost everything Garrosh did and look how that turned out.
Totally fell for this about 20 min ago. Lost 8m and 300k+ red feathers I was collecting 
I support this. Gotta love our other local teams. 
I just don’t get it. How could anyone intellectually honest say this about someone whose being nominated to serve for LIFE weighing in on decisions that shape the framework of our countries laws.  There are no words to describe how profoundly, insanely, idiotic it is to say something like that.
Nah man bin weevils is better than club penguin.
&gt; Using "culture" as an excuse to be racist doesn't mask the fact that you are, in fact, racist.  Culture is the operating system we all live by.  That’s why in the past - some cultures (such as Vikings) raped and pillaged, while others did not approve of those actions during the same time period.  It’s not an “excuse”, it has a real effect on the individuals that are raised in it.
what's her name? markle sparkle? what's it
Look at it go!
Even if the average guide is shit, it’s better than nothing. PoE is a pretty incredibly complex system. If I had had no guide to go off of and had to do 20 hours of required reading to get past white maps, I would have uninstalled a long time ago.
I never said it was a good argument.
&gt; Satyajit ray  That's because his name is not Satyajit Roy
Diz uma família de políticos brasileiro que são limpos... Os únicos que me parecem ser santos, e que são poucos (só pai e filho) são o Pedro Simon e seu filho.
This varies entirely from person to person. However I have met a lot of people who won't date someone who does these things, but no one who won't date someone because they don't do these things. 
That’s a valid statement that I would have to agree with. For how much I love How I Made My Millions, I’m almost positive it’s just a demo.
This reminds me of pythons in FLorida. In the 80s and 90s, a lot of rich Floridians bought Pythons. When they realized they make boring pets, they dumped them all off in the Everglades. Now of course the ecosystem is messed up and pythons are eating all the mammals there.
Thank you!!! I actually had no intention of doing this for my stomach, so this was an added bonus surprise!
I guess I was referring to ultra orthodox Jews but yes, you're right. 
I´d like to talk more about it with you. My mail is sissydolldidi@yandex.com
Nope. They swung like a dream. Just a disclaimer that I'm terrible and haven't broken 100 yet though, so I'm no expert. I was playing with AP2 712's though the past two years and just felt way more confident hitting these AP1's. 
A healthy relationship never hurts. 
Exactly, and the SPLC is the FBI's bitch to target opposition. People think Jeff is just sitting on his ass..LOL.
Nice. it will be over before you know it!
Of course they have springs. The problem is I shouldn’t be hearing the spring at all, and I know it’s not normal as I can compare it to 3 other joycons.
In a world of sweer potato and french fired... 
It’s treason, then.
Thankyou
The conference's main sponsors are the local universities and government (a government's funding initiative).  The information about fees for local participants is written only in the local language, so maybe they are counting on international participants not paying attention to it and not being able to read it.
No! I know it seems kinda dreary but it's the Midwest ... So just boring ha 
In RH, IQ is low volatility (see below comment &amp; i just checked too).   That said, he posted long time ago when he first purchased the 1M worth of IQ and he mentioned it. Will look for the link and update here if found.   Edit - Here we go:   [link1](https://www.reddit.com/r/RobinHood/comments/8r4vok/update_1m_iq_yolo/?st=JIEYZA70&amp;sh=4abaf908)   [link2](https://www.reddit.com/r/RobinHood/comments/8r2o50/am_i_doing_this_right_1m_yolo_on_iq/)   [link3](https://www.reddit.com/r/wallstreetbets/comments/8rc20x/im_addicted_to_iq_ps_im_the_one_that_has_1m_of_iq/)   Here is what he said "I’m 21 and a software engineer. I’m not extremely rich. My account is 500k (half of that is on margin. Sorry for the misrepresentation!)"
Bolt rail and magnetic follow up make an insane speed combo
I’m support normally but never play Ana. I always pick her in skirmish. I’m friendly, but I will sleep you and walk away even if I waved back. 
Looks like a UFO sucking a person up. 
&gt; I want to lean bulk  You got the right idea. You'll gain fat in a bulk because that's inevitable, but lean bulking will help you control that better. Honestly, you just gotta trust the process.
It's more of a mnemonic device.
What the fuck is sacred economics
excellent, that looks like it.  How can they say it was simply for warding off evil tartars on horses when Russia was [continuisly expanding ](https://de.wikipedia.org/wiki/Russische_Verhaulinie#/media/File:Russie_1300_1796.png)eastwards and putting up new "defense lines" all the time?  I mean personally I would be pretty upset if someone steals my land and than cuts it off with a wall.  Something doesn't add up. Completely possible that Tartary was simply surrounded and put under pressure and their defense was then put into history books as aggression. Everyone just hated the Tartars it seems, and their world got smaller and smaller over time.  The propaganda against them is completely engrained into our culture with the Gog &amp; Magog myth, Alexander putting them behind a big wall, etc. Looks like the Tartars are the black sheep that somehow didn't fit in with the rest of humanity.
I love so much about this. The art style is similar to an illustration in a storybook which gives the impression of a brilliant fantasy world filled with tiny dragons.
Very true. Good points!
As much as I hate most terribly balanced hunter fights, Djura is the one time I'm willing to let the game off the hook. After all, he is literally a far more experienced and powerful version of yourself. It's still early in your journey, so it makes sense that someone that's basically a post-game dream hunter himself would just outclass you. And I think it must have been a cool realization for people who put the pieces together with Djura and realized that hey, THAT'S why he's so monstrously strong.
I love the crowd energy over there too
Yeah, and put the ashes montage in the mid/post credits scenes
Because pasting posters on walls sux
"Running America like a business" is something people have run on for a while, which is legitimate in a lot of ways. Ideally, you just don't choose the business that pisses off all other businesses while seeing how many laws they can break and still get away with it.
Rabbit Mafia
126p  Edit:  I found your car, now go and buy it  580kg stock   https://en.m.wikipedia.org/wiki/Fiat_126
No not even close.
OMG!!! Cringing for you.  And yeah your dad should apologize wtf?
She just out here on the local news making statements 😂😂
Are you talking about epic crates on the map? I don't think they drop gold bars, certainly not 100 of them. It was probably 100 coins.
&gt; where no one questioned the guy on all fours, hornily growling and barking at the ass of the woman who would later become his wife. Mmm.  Nigga... **what?**  I hooked up with my One Great Fuck in those nine months. She was about twenty years older than my 19 year old ass, and taught me everything she knew about fucking. That was my real college education, right there.  I still talk to her, and, shit, I guess she's damn near sixty now.  Sixty and - yes - I'd still go there.  Repeatedly. And with gusto.
I feel like they would be a bit off flavour wise. GvG was about the two groups that like to create and tinker with machinery. They create and tear down to reuse part from old inventions. Boomsday is more about mad science. Crazy deathbots and genetically created monsters.
Nah homie this retail
If there's anything I've learned it's that "the vast majority of guys" is a very low bar.  You don't need to try very hard, you just need to show up enough times.
I think the previous owner abused the clutch driving in a city. The main thing that I'm worried about is  investing to fix it and having something else break. I just found out that a local shop will inspect your car if you donate groceries to a local food bank, so I'm going to have it fully checked out.
I bet your fore head is a insecurity
So this stops you from using discord on any of them?
The news for me 
Can confirm, in my Malacca&gt;Malaya game i was Scrooge McDucking it very quickly.
I dont observe a slow 3D touch where is this at the home screen or within apps?
Np.  If you go on warframe-builder.com you can look up builds for whatever. That might help you get a better idea of what's useful.
Any chance of you ladies wrestling on a boat in October?   P.S. its near DisneyWorld. Time for another adventure. 
 This is the scary truth.  People think that a civil war would be militia's taking to the streets to confront the government or the opposing faction.  The reality is it will look more like Oklahoma City, Ruby Ridge, the recent Austin bomber, etc, making these idiots much more similar to jihadists than "freedom fighters".  And keep in mind they DOJ backed off monitoring the far right extremists despite a rise in rhetoric and recruitment.
fnord
Did your mom concieve you out her ass,I know it's a roast, it's called having fun with it, learn to accept sarcasm in your live. LOVE YOU
It’s poisoned send it back 
You haven't tried aff lock then. It's a wrecking ball in pvp right now. 
Oh wow such a good looking dog! Dachshund body, Boxer/Pit mix face! 
World at War. I really love the story that they have for it.
&gt;But what if it is shown that allowing people to say that Americans are lesser people increases the amount of violent anti-american attacks? Would you still allow it?  As long as these individuals are not directly advocating direct violence themselves, yes.  The guilt lies with people who turn their hate to violence.  Someone who hears extreme ideas and turns them into evil acts is responsible for that alone.  To say otherwise is to deny the agency and responsibility each of us has for our own actions.  &gt;Oh you're one of those people. Someone who doubts the effectivity of all modern western societies, just because we are not all of the same colour and do not all have the same traditions.  Quite the opposite.  The paradox you present doubts it, because it assumes some external force (suppression of freedoms) is needed to hold different people together.  I believe that people, when in a society that promotes liberty and prosperity, will naturally move away from hate and towards cooperation even without hate speech laws.It takes time, there will be setbacks, as the wounds of history are deep, but largely we march ever forward if you look at the arc of history.  I'm happy to hear your friend feels at home, and hope everyone does, but when it comes to welcoming people of all backgrounds to feeling like part of society, we do relatively well overall: [http://www.un.org/esa/socdev/egms/docs/2015/sd-agenda2030/RobertoFoaPaper.pdf](http://www.un.org/esa/socdev/egms/docs/2015/sd-agenda2030/RobertoFoaPaper.pdf)
Does she cum when you eat her pussy?
Lol I like how you got strengths right but not attention. 10/10 funny comment!
**Featured Sales**  | Name | Price | Rarity | Last appearance (days) | Appearance count | Other items included | |---|---|---|---|---|---| | [Vertex](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Soldier-HID-160-Athena-Commando-M-SpeedyRed-L.png#legendary) | 2000v | Legendary | 32 days ago| 2 | [Deflector](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon-Backpacks-M-Med-Speedy-Backpack-V03orange-L.png#legendary) | | [Forerunner](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon_Glider-047-SpeedyRed-L.png#rare) | 800v | Rare | 32 days ago| 2 |  | | [Razor Edge](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon-Pickaxes-Pickaxe-ID-065-SpeedyRed-L.png#rare) | 800v | Rare | 32 days ago| 2 |  |   **Daily Sales**  | Name | Price | Rarity | Last appearance (days) | Appearance count | Other items included | |---|---|---|---|---|---| | [Raptor](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon_Glider-S-VinderTech-Glider-SKIN-MiG-L.png#uncommon) | 500v | Uncommon | 12 days ago| 10 |  | | [Scarlet Defender](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Soldier-HID-087-Athena-Commando-F-RedSilk-L.png#uncommon) | 800v | Uncommon | 11 days ago| 11 |  | | [Brawler](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Soldier-HID-021-Athena-Commando-F-L.png#rare) | 1200v | Rare | 31 days ago| 13 |  | | [Electro Shuffle](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon-Emotes-E-ElectroShuffle-L.png#epic) | 800v | Epic | 14 days ago| 28 |  | | [Spectre](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon-Pickaxes-SK-Pickaxe-25-Stealth-L.png#rare) | 800v | Rare | 15 days ago| 11 |  | | [Pure Salt](https://assets.stormshield.one/T-Icon-Emotes-E-Salty-L.png#rare) | 500v | Rare | 30 days ago| 12 |  |  (source: [Storm Shield One](https://stormshield.one/pvp/sales))
fuck
“Extend and flex, starting position move” !
You are asking why someone might be upset that their personal emails were stolen and published? What kind of stupid question is that?
*WOULD put on bookshelf*
It can be on the 1st at night for some such as myself with differing time zones and whatnot. I also haven’t seen the exact time it will drop so I’m gonna assume this is the case.
!invest 202
this sounds like a creepy conspiracy man
Also good point. 
Sagari.  Silk threads braided and toughened with glue (silk for high level rikishi, soft cotton for lower ranks.)  It marks where not to grab at the start of the match, but they often get pulled off the main belt during the grapple.  The referee (gyoji) will try to dart in and toss them from the ring if he can without getting in the way.  From the NHK sumopedia:  episode 19 sagari  https://www3.nhk.or.jp/nhkworld/en/tv/sumo/sumopedia/19/
Damm this is how I feel. I see people who travel so much (or so they claim) and I've never been outside North American. Born and raised in New York City. I can certainly afford it and plan to travel but there so much that I enjoy doing here from my favorite local parks, seeing movie, rooftop bars, conventions, amusement parks and national treasures/monuments. I'd love to explore another city with a girlfriend sometime though.
lots of people have custom subreddit themes disabled
How about no
You re uneducated. Diana knew she would be murdered in an automobile accident. Maybe read up on the topic before making a completely ignorant comment. 
Sounds good. Which ones do you have? I'm mainly looking for gen 7
Unless there's something in the contract, which you and they signed, stipulating the previous owner can request their car back, tough luck on them.   That reason they gave you is shit and can't be enforced.  Have they email you (in writing) that is the reason so if they decide to try to use other tactics later (financing/car inspection/whatever) you have that as the documented first reason which any court would throw out.
Thanks for tag
hi dad
Thanks man. I'll check it out
it filled me with the most joy a man could possibly feel
I always leave Ash. Kaiden is the best squadmate in 3.
Go ask him then, not us.
"He is the only person that has to be tarred and feathered to look better."  Edit: grammar
Lidaracola! Hold the spit. 
Cat back 
Just like the Caps!
But the sloop is fastest. In that case. And since you can only sail either with or against the wind, that makes the sloop the fastest 50 percent of the time. 
dam I hope not
I have to say, I’ve never encountered a ferret fart.   Have you changed his diet recently or given him any new treats? 
Never found issue with Shantotto in my sub-30 Kraken kills. Edea just feels slow, due to Witch spells requiring some speed-tech of some kind. I can alternate the spells, as intended, but that is just a band-aid compared to the other two. I got Onion Sage USB and Edward's USB (who can also use AcM), so I can support it externally, but Matoya and Shantotto don't need it, which is nicer for them.  EDIT: And with the new VIII banner in JP, you now have a choice with Edea USBs: USB1 for Ability Double vs USB2 for Ice Quick Cast. At least she got a W-Cast Ice LMR too.
Sorry, that's tough.  Have you visited the financial aid office and ask them what they suggest?  Also, if you don't need a car, I would suggest getting rid of it. If you need a way to commute, consider getting a bicycle.  Lastly, are you working? If not, ask if you qualify for a work study program. If not, try to pick up a part time job on or around university campus. I was lucky enough to have a part time job in second year and it covered the shortfall between financial aid and what I actually needed to pay for loans.  The last resort is private student loans, but those tend to have horrible terms and extremely high interest rates. Kind of like payday loans. I would only use them as a last resort.
&gt; In my experience, leadership will say they want "a single pane of glass" for encryption across all platforms. It's stupid af and makes it harder for us to support Macs, because now we have to wait for our encryption client to get updated for each new version of macOS.  +elevnty million upvotes!  So, we had the same debacle at my Org.  They wanted to centralize FDE keys. My team, which does all the Mac IT and related services for all Macs at my Org met with the people that wanted the single pane of glass. I explained to them that yes, I can setup a redirect profile to ship the FV2 to any service, but they did not want to host anything, they wanted to just direct DB connector to my services and grab it.  I explained, it doesn't work that way, that you will need to build an API or an App I can ship data to. From there how you consume it and how you put it into your systems is 100% up to you.  Then I mentioned that their service must be publicly exposed, as we have Mac Clients off campus and off network all the time, and all of our services are in The Cloud.  So, they will need to expose an API or an appliance to the Internet to escrow the keys.  They were like we cannot do that.  Then I said they would be solely responsible for all FDE keys, data, and integrity of said keys and rotation of said keys because once it leaves our systems we have zero control over any of it.  At the end of my meeting with the team responsible for the single pane of glass of FDE keys, they basically said they were not interested in doing any of that because it was too much work.  So, that was the one and only meeting I ever had about shipping the FV2 keys to a centralized system for the single pane of glass.
Dude seriously! August is now my favorite month
I agree we should care.  But the Left and democrats are voting to rob the individuals, neighbors, next door to them so the uncaring govt can 'care' for people. The democrats and Left are not voting that they themselves actually get their hands dirty. It's not like they are voting to use  their own time and money. They are voting to use other peoples time and money that the govt robbed off of their neighbors for them.  Like I said, neo-Democrats and the people on the Left really don't desire to be personally responsible like the Right teaches. They dont want to be responsible for their own HC. They dont want to be responsible for paying for their own college education.
I’m more surprised they didn’t bring back the boom bots in one way or another. I know the original was really swingy but I thought they might redesign and print a new one. I know goblin bomb is a thing but it really isn’t the same...
My current theory is that it's the same douchebag that convinced them all pizzagate was real. 
That sounds exactly like the Crucible BEFORE this SBMM glitch....  "I play with two freinds, neither of whom are great". Gee, well I'm not so great either, but the difference between us is I ONLY ever played Solo, and I have always been getting "curb-stomped" becuase being solo was a death sentence.   I dreaded playing Crucible before this becuase it was only the Stacked Teams that ever had fun, so I just stopped.  But now, im finally playing Crucible for fun again, and not just dreading through it for the Milestone, and it's about damn time. So, I guess it's going to suck for someone either way. At least now, a Solo player can finally have some fun. And that sounds like an overall better Crucible to me
Wow. This is a much better photo than the one that the business association has commemorating the event.  I'm not home to check but I believe, for those curious, the fire came from a forge a part of the saddlery and destroyed most of this side of Queen Street. Townsfolk attempted to put out the fire with buckets from the estuary awaiting response from Papakura.  https://digitalnz.org/records/35065315 - more accounts of the extent of the damage.   1926 faced another great fire on the other side of Queen Street between the Kentish Hotel and Bowen Street, destroying yet more of the town
I'm ringing by the fog
This film is not in IMDb's Top 250.
6ix9ine is hard too
I swear she gets hotter with age, I feel she looked older 15 years ago. 
recneliS
Dang you are now resorting to name calling? Look you are having a bad day, I'ma let this one slide but I would appreciate it if we kept it about sports
I'm not groveling thanking the government for anything. I pay my taxes because that's what I agree to by living here, and if I don't like what I do about them then I vote to change that. If the rest of my community disagrees with me then I either live with it or move. 
They don't have voting representation
Anyone with an eight of a brain cell would believe multiple studies over their own guess.
THE WALLET
just enough to be annoying when ordering a burrito
u/johannesjackleheimer has a unique way of putting things, but I agree with his assessment; the program may be a better choice because it's helping disadvantaged students.
Don’t be shy at all 😍
 Whether God chooses it or not is an age old question I believe. It comes with the question of what's God's "control" ,for lack of a better word, his omnipotence or his perfect nature. I think it works harmoniously so that God chooses to carry out the punishment because that's what is just, and it must happen because it's a part of God's perfect nature.
Done. Thanks.
Seriously though like the other guy said. Play with the trigger screws(theres 3) and set it to your liking. Aside of that, this gun is seriously the perfect marker. The only thing it doesn't have is an OLED screen. But you'll set your parameters once and never play with that again anyway.  I'd say learn how to change firing modes(its simple, the manual can be a little tricky to understand, but there's a good many videos online that show step by step) just so you can swap from ramping to semi. Then chrono it and adjust the velocity of needed. Mine was shooting at 240 out of box.   Welcome to the etha2 master race. You'll love this gun.  Edit: after owning this gun, I purchased an ETEK5 OLED on a FB B/S/T group for 350.   I still use my etha2 more than the etek. 
How can he possibly get defensive/ be unable to communicate about basic human decency and paying you rent? Wtf?
Bet you wont give me that turtle cert on the twinzer for a Velocity :) lol
What you're doing is what you're supposed to be doing; just complete your daily quests and do the events.  Focus on getting a full 5\* team, then a 6\* team. Maybe you'll get a lucky summon, maybe you won't.  This is the first (and not even a big one) of your many hurdles to overcome in the game.  Enjoy idling.
It actually is because bot has always been 3 adcs.
I was just there, IYCBYEaE’s is still on the shelf!
Add me mstocot
I feel you... try farming 42 see if that 100% still lasts :^)
What area would you like experience in?
Well they did ( ° ͜ʖ͡°)
IIRC this happened to a play. some writer was trying to get ideas of how to portray a man from feminists(cause so woke yo). and they gave that person a bunch of character changes for the male lead, they tried them out. and literally no one like this character afterwards. 
Cracking open an old one with the boys. But seriously be gentle with older hardbacks, the binding can indeed break if handled roughly.
"civil rights" is meant to mean not being discriminated against based on your sexuality by the government.  You cannot stop private citizens from discriminating against you without seriously curtailing the freedom of everyone.  Why aren't you capable of discussing this in good faith? I think I've made myself clear that I wouldn't discriminate against you and I'd even boycott those who did.  You say I'm preaching oppression because I think business owners should have the freedom of association. That is ridiculous. If you can't see the difference between freedom and oppression that is on you. But saying I'm preaching oppression is at best in bad faith if not malicious and idiotic.
You can either go the “copy&amp;paste”route, or buy the bundle. 
I'm sorry, isn't this good? Recast doesn't mean Ewan retaining the role, recasting would be getting a new actor  Or did we switch to Pratt's side? I've been busy so idk
As few or as many as you please! I'm not the u-usage police, it's your vacation! :D
The rest of the world doesn't have to worry about that so long as they don't accept debt in currencies they don't control.  That was Zimbabwe's problem. They accepted Debt in US Dollars. Which was a dumb idea.  See also: Greece, which like California, can't print its currency, but unlike California, has no bankruptcy protections.
Genius analogy. So simple yet so effective lmao, idk why tf no one thought of that analogy yet 
You could have two of the three things about healthcare:  -Universiality -Quality -Affordability  It's very easy to grandstand and say we need to tax the wealthy, like we already are by the way. I'm just tired of many people acting like they have solved the healthcare problem and just spout these "ideas" without an actual plan besides tax big business and the wealthy, because we already have and it didn't solve anything.
2 soft corn tortillas, shredded chicken, cheese and lettuce
You are very young.. nothing lost man.  One thing I want to know, the adult who was sending you porn, did he know you were doing nofap? Or did he notice you were on a self-improvement journey? Or did he send that out of the blue (in other words, he somehow felt your vibrational ascent and felt threatened and wanted to pull you down?)
Hm, yeah I suppose you're right. Went ahead and tested it with a Ninjask too.  Alright then, editing my post.  I haven't really played Super in a while since I have it 100% and don't wanna delete the save. You were right, certainly less broken. Guess I forgot, fair enough.
Oh shit. TI7 Treasure III part II? 
tell that to the 'good players' that quit h1z1
Definately in political subreddits.  Reddit should just remove the downvote button, the majority opinion will be upvoted more anyway. Why should minorities be censored? It's pointless. Just more heavily incorporate report functions.
Young Anakin looks like this one kid that was in my kindergarten class who would always pick his nose and then go chasing people with his dirty finger
Here in North Idaho it's nice for scouting.  If I get something on the ground the. I call the better half to bring the truck or quad. 
How does one reset a baseball game? Asking for a friend
I love your sick mind you demented fucking profligate @haupt91
49 days of actual game time, as in 1176+ hours?
Muh daddy.
cursed_roadtrip
&gt; Most of them don't even look like they match. They are not "beautiful couples".  C'mon... Just a little further...
Oh my gosh this is so cute.
Definitely pick up doom 2016 and the original
Dead!
Because the used a perfectly truthful and neutral description, that somehow means they hate torches? I don’t follow. 
I mean cans help ease the pain.
“I’m going to move to Japan and become the coolest person there with 25 Japanese girlfriends and also I gain super powers somehow.”
Welcome to the sub !!
Gullit no question
&gt; He got retconned in lore to be one of Doomhammer's lieutenants after he got popular in Vanilla.  Ooooh so that's why I don't remember him from W3!
I was just thinking of this guy. How do you like those pinks?
Suspense
Why would I take drugs from a strange girl who is skilled in poisons?
The boots are like 4+ inch heels so she'd definitely need that post for balance.
I wouldn't use them as rings but they're pretty.
One of the most amazingly stupidly horrible things to witness in the last several years was the Right somehow managing to convince people that being intolerant of intolerance is just as bad if not worse than the intolerance. 
Muslims are salivating over this one. They can kill the Canadian infidel knowing fully that they aren’t aremed. 
I wouldn't.
This piques my interest.
Sorry I’m late to this convo but I’ve been on vacation...anyways, does anyone have any idea or theories as to what the “corn” jacket could’ve been now that we have JJD and some background on him (maybe some organization he could’ve belonged to or something like this)?
Thanks! I’ve been waiting for this! By far the best SDCC exclusive IMO.
There is no discrepancy. You just didn't read it.
The entire story seems to be an allegory for losing a war.
Thank you very much.
A lack of competitive elections breeds corruption. Nunes has already decided that talking to his constituents, unless they pay for a fundraiser, isn't necessary, so what's keeping him honest? Even if you don't think he's corrupt, what's stopping him from becoming so? 
My reasoning is that I can't figure out what makes the Doctor so very British in the first place.  * It's not race, so we can get that off the table right away; the whole idea that the Doctor must look like someone who might have been waiting on the shore when the Normans came calling doesn't hold up. I'd love to see Adrian Lester or Sacha Dhawan play the Doctor.  * It's not the accent, plainly; we've had a couple of Scots, a Northerner (two, soon), lots of Queen's English... there's been a lot of variety there, even if they've all been from the UK. I can't see that there's anything radically different about choosing an American accent over a British one, especially given the variety of accents we already have here. It's not as though the Doctor always has to fit into a particular UK regional stereotype. Lots of planets have a North. Lots of planets probably have a America (or equivalent) too.  * Is it a sort of *quintessential Britishness*? Well, what does that even mean? The role would still be written largely by British writers; the humour and sentiment would still be largely British, rather than having an American flavour to it. Would it even be noticeable if an American actor did a flawless British accent (the same way Hugh Laurie did in reverse for *House*)? I'd argue that that wouldn't matter -- but in that case, we just go back to the accent point from above. To say that there's a *quintessential Britishness* implies that there *is* something that can be caricatured, and that it and only it is right for this one particular character -- a sentiment that has to pervade the character. Well, we've had twelve different versions of this one guy and they've all been super different to each other. I find it difficult to agree with the idea that the one thing that links every iteration is an unknowable British vibe, so I think this one's out too.  * Is it an out-of-universe issue? That one seems the most compelling. The idea of the show being British through and through -- like *Harry Potter*, where Rowling insisted on a British cast -- might be a big part of its appeal. In that case, though, could we have an American companion? Would that somehow break the illusion of it being a show that *we* made? I don't think so. The leap to an American Doctor doesn't seem all that far after that.  Can I think of any Americans offhand that I'd like to play the Doctor? No, not really -- but that doesn't really mean much; I'm not a casting director, and this is just a hypothetical. I'm not saying I think this is something that *should* happen. But could it?  Well, I can't see why not.
It's obviously the button with the red dot.
I would like to also add:  Mix set is much stronger than nohime set. But it is harder to use (not as consistant) as you have to know when the effect of schrod top will activate for maximum damage.  Therefore: If the playstyle revolves around a lot of QTE switching from then go for mixed set.  If playstyle is mainly using memento to kill enemies and not much of switching QTE then use full nohime set. Nohime set works much better when using memento solo mainly.  2
Now do sweaty psalms
fucking seriously i just bought it and am already employing it in a track hahah
Hybrid meme
true but youd be better off playing prison decks if thats the style you like.  
They lose appointments.   They should have a priority queue for people who just need to file a paper and go. 
The original duck face
That's Cervelli!
Those are dope.
Oh I know I'm getting screwed, haha. But we have two options, right, Spectrum or Cincy Bell? And I don't want Cincy Bell, so...
Sure thing! For money of course. 
I’m going this year for Computer Information Systems
I'm not even hyped for this episode. The next two episodes better impress me. You got this JJG!
A famous sensei said it best: "wax on, wax off!"
Those are banned.
It would be a nasty TW team. Not so much for arena. Easily beaten.
Here is your reading  https://youtu.be/quhRDD-cuGc
It is indeed a double standard but in this case its not your choice to make, its your boss’s
Mine too it’s sooo bad. Even just cleaning my house I’ll be drenched in sweat. When I work out I pretty much accept the fact I’ll be drenched. 
rule #1 of driving: every white ford explorer is a cop
His twink body is certainly well complimented by war harnesses
you can do everything digitally.  i would imagine many people still like to do sketches on physical paper, but many artists just draw digitally using some tablet system (see https://youtu.be/ahpUb_RzGJA).  there's no reason to draw something on paper and then digitize it. just draw it digitally.
One could argue that this helps making it feel like a real environment, instead of something like Fortnites map.
Yeah I honestly never understood why Phoenix existed. I spent a decent amount of time there in the metro area when I lived in AZ. That’s the only place I’ve really heard that word haha
I think it's important to note that neither you nor she knew that Sylvanas was going to burn down Teldrassil at the time she hands her hippogryph off to you.  She assumed (somewhat correctly) that Sylvanas was just going to invade, capture and occupy the tree.  She even tells you before you set off to 'make sure her people are treated well under the horde's occupation.'  It just so happened Sylvanas changed her mind at the drop of a hat.
I'll pass. You should get the bundle if you want the game. It's still lower than the historical low, which was around $10.
Only clearing the cache worked for me.
A sunbrella!
Are we just going to ignore that he put Godzilla’s anus? 
Purvi Patel has been out of prison after appeals for two years and feticide laws are super state by state when it comes to whether or not they include abortion, this article seems out of date. 
honestly  if your planning to develop your pc into someone who grows to accept their powers then its kinda the point for you to be a little annoying cas if your not its not a satisfying development   maybe you could make it a characteristic of ur pc that he/she whilst not liking to use their magic a lot always uses it to heal when they see someone is hurt. (or something like that which could be used to make you slightly better than just a deadweight)
Same. I'm a supporter of our health care and one of the things that I like is that there is a bit more of a focus on preventative education and health care than in the US, but then it does ultimately rely on individuals trying to minimize their own risk.  Which a lot of people will do because there's an obvious personal benefit to themselves, but a lot of others just...won't.
What a homeless person isn't allowed to own a $1000 bike?
It's not just lie about Islam, it's lie to kaffir anyway you need To facilitate a takeover.
If you are a T-mobile customer, they have a $5.50 credit on Vudu
This kid is BEYOND AWESOME 
* **Ant-Man &amp; The Wasp #4** - great mini so far, loving the characterisation and just overall execution * **Astonishing X-Men #14** - last issue was decent, but the Land's artwork really does not help it * **Batman #52** - loved the first issue of this story, King and Weeks are one hell of a creative duo * **Captain America #2** - the first issue was really good and very well-written, hope the trend continues * **Death of the Inhumans #2** - who wants to place the bets on who's dying this time? * **Green Lanterns #52** - nothing too exciting but still a fun read, I guess I'll stick around until the ending * **Immortal Hulk #4** - who could have guessed that I would be so excited for a Hulk book? * **Infinity Wars #1** - the big event is here and I am very excited about it * **Justice League #5** - focus on the villains and written by Tynion, should be good * **Mister Miracle #10** - it's been quite some time since the last issue, but it's finally here * **Nightwing #47** - really enjoying this arc so far * **Paper Girls #23** - the last issue ended on a great moment, can't wait to see where it goes now * **The Seeds #1** - Aja's art is more than enough for me to at least give it a try * **Seven to Eternity #10** - can't believe it's finally here. I would be lying if I would say I actually remember much of what has happened in the book, but I am still super happy about it being back
Cool, me too! What show are you going to?
denial is first stage of acceptance
so original.
So glad this is at the tops. Completely agree and i actually do like making them and people ordering them. 
Thanks
I like Heifer Project. It helps people to help themselves and is self-perpetuating.  https://www.heifer.org
Where are the best pupusas in Columbia Heights?  I don’t mind Ercilia’s but they always seem to take forever to make them
Hey! Reading this from Grand Rapids, and I have a degree from CMU to boot. Quite an interesting story! Quite the turn around. 
Your hint yielded a blanket statement you made about him, as if it was indicative of him in general. There’s plenty of contradictory examples on whether or not he gives a damn. Ballad in Plain D, Sara... countless others.   Eh, sorry. It just seemed you were happy to throw a label on him, like the movie magazines of yore.
Y
I feel offended that they think we're just trying to deceive people like that... Im over here trying to summon the big man himself, I'm sure my buddies are doing something at least as unholy... We dont have time to tell you whether the earth is flat or not. We dont *care* to tell you whether the earth is flat or not. 
😂
More like addressing bullshit 
Like most chemicals that inhibit certain brain functions, there’s some evidence that THC can have long term negative effects on developing brains. I’m all for it being legal, but it definitely should be out of the hands of kids.
The better choice 👍🏻
Fun Fact: Mithy helped C9 a little bit during Worlds 2017 Playoff prep. 
I mean that technically means that monkeys are smarter than flat earthers, so yea
i can give you the vegas file, but don't you need all of the pictures/videos too for it to work?
yea that doesnt work if you are under 6'8.. they will shoot and make it. especially since they have Gold Deep-Range Deadeye
so you must be pretty fast then? or are the tracks you drive on real high speed? ive done a few HPDEs in my older honda and while the pads are certainly worn down a bit..they still have plenty of meat on them but i only really drive the car once or twice a week and obviously to and from the track. using hawk pads too...   how long are you expecting the pads to last on these new brakes? 
You have to keep it and spend it. A loss in the money supply will trigger deflation and cause a national recession.
AA has helped me a great deal. If you choose to attend, try not to focus on things that you don't vibe with but rather, the things you do like (e.g. maintaining sobriety and the pursuit of happiness and peace of mind).   Good luck and congrats on day 1. 
&gt; Malfurion, who is one of the strongest people on Azeroth   also got ganked by Saurfang and raped by the SHADOW of Xavius
Can I nominate this as best Schaub quote ever? “I dont like being naked in warm water, it’s super exotic to me.”
Maybe if it's a mixtape he won't care
You're building quite a strawman there.  Nobody is suggesting people should "have to shit all over the floor because they don't have a toilet."  Nobody is saying there should be no "health regulations."  What I "propose" is a landlord and their tenet coming to an agreement on their own about a property to be rented.  If the landlord offers 10,000,000 stations of movies and a 2,000" television and the tenet agrees then that is what needs to happen.  If the landlord tells the tenet the property doesn't include running water and the tenet accepts it, then that's what they get.  Allow the market to do its job and if someone wants to rent a property with no toilet then great, if not, the landlord will need to install one in order to win someone's business.  &gt;So lets just throw the last 137 years of progress out the window!  Literally nobody has said this.  I'm sorry that the point has eluded you, I tried to make it as simple as possible but apparently I did not aim low enough.
It actually doesn't depend on how you look at it. There's one way to look at it and that is you are literally jerking off while you watch another man fuck a woman that you wish you could "get with." Porn is cuckholdings ugly cousin.
Wow, nice. I always found biology intimidating. I'm in physics, planetary science.  Well my classmate can't help but see me as a rival and plays that as a zero-sum game, where winning = beating others. Her jokes about stealing love and attention from our adviser sounded less and less like jokes. You know what it does to the hypersensitivity of a BPD. She went from admiring me to talking down to me. And we dated. When I stood up to her continuous low-key abuse (not in the most adult way... first a few days of silent treatment before I had cooled off enough to have a direct conversation), she cut me off. She's completely ignoring me now. My attempt to talk with her was rewarded by niceties like "It doesn't matter since you're leaving".  I was so hurt, my BPD symptoms became strong enough for me to remember this list I had heard a few years ago, so I went to my therapist with that idea and was diagnosed.  I am friends with plenty of people I work around, friends work fine, maybe it's a bit more delicate if you directly work with them. I don't know how you'd tolerate a workplace where you're not friend with anyone! Dating proved to be a mistake, but this girl clearly got her own issues. And it's not like I can afford to be picky, women seem to sniff the BPD and run away.
Please remember not to upvote or downvote comments based on the user's karma value in any particular subreddit. Downvotes should only be used if the comment is something completely off-topic, and even if you disagree with the comment (or dislike the user who wrote it), please abide by [reddiquette](https://www.reddit.com/wiki/reddiquette) the best you possibly can.  Spread the love!
qt also missed everything, even his point and click Q.
The thing is they’re shipping loads of Mini X orders that are 920xx to 940xx lately, so I don’t think that’s it. I’m thinking it’s location based? Lots of the latest orders are Cali orders.
It is amazing but I feel like the color palettes overused already. Project, Championship, freljord etc. Literally her best skins has blue hues except Heartseeker ofcourse.
It's hidden under some dirt that can either be blanked away, or walked over repeatedly to clear the dust.  The hint for that room is that it will have rats spawned in it. However, the rats can die, so it's easy to miss if you're not paying attention.
According to [when I saw this](https://i.imgur.com/6k3gHuK.png), everything's right, just hold tight. 
food trucks 
Odds Sale’s replacement pitches 7 shutout innings?
I'm skeptical that any physics professor who looks at it closely would ever believe it.  The main thing that first caused the 9/11 conspiracies is how the buildings collapsed with debris shooting out of it like a bomb. Some people said it was like a bunch of bombs going off in one story after another.  The truth is once the support beams got too weak to hold up the rest of the building it collapsed on itself. The debris shot out of it like a bomb because the roof collapsed. All the air inside the collapsing floors had nowhere to go but through the smashed walls, and the air took a bunch of debris with it (that followed for the same reason).
Probably because you were IP or hardware banned. Either reset your router if your IP is dynamic or use a VPN if it has to do with your IP.
Stoned out thug version of an Easter island head
Goldwater played fast and loose with nuclear weapons, supported escalation of military conflict with Russia, and made dismantling America’s social safety net a core principal of his political life.   Every Republican — from Richard Nixon to George W. Bush — can look to Goldwater as an intellectual father of their governmental fecklessness. He wanted, actively, to dismantle the institutions that make the American government strong enough to handle the challenges we, as Democrats, ask it to.  And, on top of all that, his vehement opposition to the Civil Rights Act cannot be hand-waved away — least of all from a political party that is, right now, attempting to position itself as the party of people of color in this country.   At best, Goldwater was a political coward who used the racist white vote to accrue power for his protolibertarian political philosophy. At worst, he was a monster.   Why are we spending time defending the father of the modern Republican Party? 
Rock and roll is the real religion \\m/
Post the meme about it on Reddit to get karma in game and on Reddit
Fan service*
Taxes and regulations aren't the reason for-profit companies don't solve the resource distribution problem.   The profit incentive IS the resource distribution problem. There is plenty of food, clothing, and shelter to go around, but companies are only interested in providing them to paying customers.   So, those who can afford food, clothing, and shelter have them in excess. So much so that most food food purchased in restaurants goes to waste,  and high end fashion lines burn unsold inventory rather than donate it.   Because there is NO incentive in a capitalist system to provide goods and services to those who can't pay i.e. those who need it most. 
(Fires a bullet into his own brain stem)
First Homer of the Archer Era!
Bleeding Gums Murphy 
Your comment made me look at your username and realize how cool you are. 
A lot of people have also never cared for live plants before, so they avoid stepping into unknown territory. 
Much
Justin Schwartz
Well I don’t want to play devils advocate, but anything that stops the incessant dodge rolling strats is good in my book. It’s like the next big thing in “high level” duelling.   Edit: not just kick-grab, it’s anything at all you roll away from. 
You gonna need alot of jamming.
She must have been abused. Who would ‘mire that shit? 
Just finished some research on nitroethylene solvatochromic probes, from computer simulation to lab experiments. An overall success but that also means a hell of a lot more work from this stage to truly achieve any major results. Unfortunately my tenure with the programme has come to an end so someone else is gonna be doing the rest from here. Onto the next one I guess! 
The dog can’t distinguish if you’re scolding it or the elevator. You’re better off rewarding the dog, in baby steps, or approaching the elevator and then getting in it. 
I’m broke and can’t afford to do something that would be a huge positive life changer although I’ve tried to make the money needed but couldn’t and tomorrow’s my deadline so I’ve been very depressed and feel like I’ve failed my kids. 
Yield means stop if others are already in the lane, not merge. 
I'd be down if there's an opening.  Might need more info because I'll be super busy mid-late Aug which is when most drafts seem to be
I dunno, I think it might be tainted with the knowledge that the next step is waiting to die. I don’t think that feeling will ever be replicated, I’ve  jumped past many high pressure hurdles since but I never really got that feeling back. 
I see Lucio wasn't effected by the snap
Honestly, even 100hz is enough for racing games.
Keto is a great diet to be on **if** you're already healthy. I actually ended up super-ripped for a while, but that was combined with serious exercise. You can't just go on keto and expect ketosis to kick in and do all the work for you.
This guy loves starting arguments over nothing. I honestly think it does help him sleep at night.
r/quityourbullshit Why did I get downvoted smh
No Google Pay for me yet =(
Pretty sure there was an entire Avatar server back a few years ago. I don't know how good it was.  Though the Minecraft train has long departed.
He just said "how many of levels of ideology are you on?" without challenging my point. He never clarified what he meant, even.  It is a mode of production. Okay. Don't see how that would make it immoral.
!invest 3000
"Eyes, lungs... Bank lease... So many slacks, so little time."  What-the-actual-fuck is he saying?
post your source hes a paedophile 
Scientology is lit fam
Perhaps. Or maybe, unlike Hannity’s viewers, the advertisers truly understand how feeble his numbers really are and will not do so. We shall see. 
Booked.  $20 Gross  $20 Mayes  $20 Sumter
That's why I also mentioned cores.? How has no one noticed that.?
Anyone else notice the Avengers "A" logo is not a poster option?  IT'S DRIVING ME NUTS!
You're welcome
&gt;Imagine if we lived in a world where the worst thing anyone ever experienced was a stomach ache.   Wow, that would be such a great world. So much nicer than this one. I wonder why an all-powerful, all loving God didn't create that world? If He existed, that is.
I'm the Commander and this is my favorite tattoo in Rata Sum.
This is ridiculous. As if the general public would pour into PBE 18xx games.
Good
Why do people continue to think they are doing you a favor by taking a free thing off your hands?   Like, I get that if someone's giving something away for free obviously they just want to get rid of it, but it's fucking free, just take it! This is why I hate people.
True, but I barely do it and get away with that pretty easily.  It's the whole tone, the way teachers are taught is ridiculously simplistic. They basically give you a checklist on how to make your method, material or approach "educational"/"interesting" but on a base level, few teachers know how to talk with kids, grasp at straws on how to motivate them or approach them. You get folders on "good rules to apply" and then teachers read off the new rules and later sighs in the teachers lounge how they won't work and those awful kids don't take them seriously already.   I feel like our educationsystem rarely takes it's students seriously. And I feel like highschool ends up defining you more instead of learning you how to define yourself. 
We do although we have a software development team in-house that would handle things like that
So you admit your post is a reposti! Deploy the downvotes!
Are you considering the amount of fatigue built up in the previous five events? 
Do you have Icleaner, or Icleaner Pro?  Try this [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/jailbreak/comments/6kvxvf/tutorial_how_to_fix_issues_by_disabling_tweaks_on/)
I'd download games to bring home and play on my PC haha
Plenty of pitchers have the ability to win a Cy Young but more than likely Archer’s best days are behind him.   That doesn’t mean his contract isn’t one of the best in baseball but he’s not an ace and it absolutely would shock me to see archer with a sub 3 ERA because that’s the “Nats will finally win a playoff series” of pitchers.   Until it actually happens I’ll go with what history has shown instead of what intuition feels like.  Archer wasn’t even one of the 5 best pitchers in the AL East and now he’s supposed to be a Cy Young winner? I’m not buying it, as much as this sub loves to hype up everyone at the trade deadline. 
I’ve got posts in this sub from 7 years ago - some of my first posts were here, before I was even old enough to pay attention to politics.  So pick your toys up out of my yard, yo
RemindMe! 3 days
I already am taking DSP. Was hoping to take digital communications too but couldn't. So I have to pick one of the 3 courses aside from DSP in my post. I was asking which of those 3 is best for this field. 
Just google for some shady Minecraft launchers (that have version 1.13 too), it's not that hard.
Ah this repost again...
You don't need to have your wisdom teeth out or your tailbone cut off either.
There's a Popeye's buffet? 
You got 92
Here are some other articles about this story:  * usnews.com: [Trump Administration Considering Tax Break on Capital Gains](https://www.usnews.com/news/business/articles/2018-07-31/trump-administration-considering-tax-break-on-capital-gains) * boingboing.net: [Trump wants to hand a $100,000,000,000 tax cut to the super-rich, without Congressional approval](https://boingboing.net/2018/07/31/0-1-percent-gets-66-percent.html) * businessinsider.com: [Trump's capital gains inflation index tax cut: Is it legal?](https://www.businessinsider.com/trump-capital-gains-inflation-index-tax-cut-is-it-legal-2018-7) * newsweek.com: [Trump Weighs Bypassing Congress to Give Ultra-Wealthy $100 Billion in Tax Cuts](https://www.newsweek.com/trump-tax-cuts-mnuchin-kudlow-middle-class-1050325) * commondreams.org: [But How Will They Pay for It? Trump Plan Would Bypass Congress to Hand Rich Another $100 Billion in Tax Cuts](https://www.commondreams.org/news/2018/07/31/how-will-they-pay-it-trump-plan-would-bypass-congress-hand-rich-another-100-billion) * budgetmodel.wharton.upenn.edu: [Indexing Capital Gains to Inflation — Penn Wharton Budget Model](http://budgetmodel.wharton.upenn.edu/economic-matters/2018/3/23/indexing-capital-gains-to-inflation) * cnn.com: [How a small change in tax policy could mean a big tax cut for the rich](https://www.cnn.com/2018/07/31/politics/capital-gains-tax-cut/index.html) * vice.com: [Trump's Eyeing Another Huge Tax Cut for the Rich and It's Probably Illegal](https://www.vice.com/en_us/article/qvmzk7/trumps-eyeing-another-huge-tax-cut-for-the-rich-and-its-insane) * justice.gov: [Legal Authority of the Department of the Treasury to Issue Regulations Indexing Capital Gains ... - Department of Justice](https://www.justice.gov/file/20536/download) * cnbc.com: [US can’t afford Trump’s stealth $100 billion tax cut for rich](https://www.cnbc.com/2018/07/31/insana-us-cant-afford-trumps-stealth-100-billion-tax-cut-for-rich.html) * huffingtonpost.com: [Republicans Look To Go All-In On Tax Cuts For The Rich](https://www.huffingtonpost.com/entry/gop-capital-gains-tax-cut-mnuchin-trump_us_5b608574e4b0fd5c73d39416) * bloomberg.com: [Terms of Service Violation](https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2018-07-31/white-house-is-said-not-to-be-actively-weighing-cap-gains-change) * politico.com: [Push for another upper-income tax cut gets Treasury's attention](https://www.politico.com/story/2018/07/31/tax-cut-upper-income-treasury-department-capital-gains-716320) * nbcnews.com: [Trump administration considering tax break on capital gains](https://www.nbcnews.com/politics/politics-news/trump-administration-considering-tax-break-capital-gains-n896291) * reuters.com: [Capital gains tax cut idea puts pressure on Trump administration](https://www.reuters.com/article/usa-tax-capitalgains/capital-gains-tax-cut-idea-puts-pressure-on-trump-administration-idUSL1N1UR20S) * nytimes.com: [Trump's Crony Capitalists Plot a New Heist](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/07/31/opinion/editorials/100-billion-tax-cut-mnuchin.html) * npr.org: [Trump Administration Eyes Capital Gains Tax Cut](https://www.npr.org/2018/07/31/634396871/trump-administration-eyes-capital-gains-tax-cut) * foxbusiness.com: [Trump capital gains tax cut: What to know](https://www.foxbusiness.com/politics/trump-capital-gains-tax-cut-what-to-know) * nytimes.com: [Trump Administration Mulls a Unilateral Tax Cut for the Rich](https://www.nytimes.com/2018/07/30/us/politics/trump-tax-cuts-rich.html)  -----  I am a bot trying to encourage a balanced news diet.  These are all of the articles I think are about this story. I do not select or sort articles based on any opinions or perceived biases, and neither I nor my creator advocate for or against any of these sources or articles. It is your responsibility to determine what is factually correct.
Thank you; Should have thought of the Wiki. I was more familiar with stickies
Not to the police.  Not to the Judge.  Not to the jury.  Not to the appellate court.  Not to the federal Court.  Not to the Supreme Court.  I'd keep going but Dassey ran out of Courts.
Ask if there is any work available for me to do. Or ask colleagues if they need help with anything.
I bet probably Saturday or Sunday. 
